4904 | risky (adjective): involving risk or danger | loc: kockázatos
  EN TS: Those chairs look a bit risky.
  hu TS: Azok a székek kicsit kockázatosnak tűnnek.
  EN FS: Those tables look a bit risky.
  hu FS: Azok az asztalok kicsit kockázatosnak tűnnek.
  EN TP: a risky stack of chairs
  hu TP: kockázatos széktorony
  EN FP: a risky bet on horses
  hu FP: kockázatos lóversenyfogadás
4905 | span (verb): to cover or extend over an area | loc: átívelni
  EN TS: The bridge spans the canyon.
  hu TS: A híd átível a kanyon felett.
  EN FS: The bridge spans the street.
  hu FS: A híd átível az utca felett.
  EN TP: arches spanning a canyon
  hu TP: kanyont átívelő boltívek
  EN FP: a short attention span
  hu FP: rövid figyelmi idő
4906 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: sátor
  EN TS: The tent is the only survivor.
  hu TS: Egyedül a sátor élte túl.
  EN FS: The arch is the only survivor.
  hu FS: Egyedül a boltív élte túl.
  EN TP: a white party tent
  hu TP: fehér partisátor
  EN FP: a tent in the woods
  hu FP: sátor az erdőben
4907 | speaker (noun): a device that converts signals into sounds | loc: hangszóró
  EN TS: Big speaker, dancing water.
  hu TS: Nagy hangszóró, táncoló víz.
  EN FS: Big speaker, dancing milk.
  hu FS: Nagy hangszóró, táncoló tej.
  EN TP: a big club speaker
  hu TP: nagy klubhangszóró
  EN FP: a speaker at a conference
  hu FP: előadó egy konferencián
4908 | branch (noun): a stem growing out from a plant's main stem | loc: ág
  EN TS: Someone is bending a branch.
  hu TS: Valaki meghajlít egy ágat.
  EN FS: Someone is cutting a branch.
  hu FS: Valaki levág egy ágat.
  EN TP: bending an apple branch
  hu TP: almafaág meghajlítása
  EN FP: a branch of a bank
  hu FP: egy bankfiók
4909 | famous (adjective): widely known and admired by people | loc: híres
  EN TS: People are filming her like she is famous.
  hu TS: Úgy filmezik, mintha híres lenne.
  EN FS: People are painting her like she is famous.
  hu FS: Úgy festik, mintha híres lenne.
  EN TP: famous for a minute
  hu TP: egy percig híres
  EN FP: famous for her songs
  hu FP: híres a dalairól
4910 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: sál
  EN TS: He is screaming in his team scarf!
  hu TS: Ordít a szurkolói sáljában!
  EN FS: He is sleeping in his team scarf!
  hu FS: Alszik a szurkolói sáljában!
  EN TP: a striped team scarf
  hu TP: csíkos szurkolói sál
  EN FP: a warm winter scarf
  hu FP: meleg téli sál
4911 | owner (noun): someone who owns a business | loc: tulajdonos
  EN TS: She is the new owner!
  hu TS: Képzeld, egy nő az új tulajdonos!
  EN FS: He is the new owner!
  hu FS: Képzeld, egy férfi az új tulajdonos!
  EN TP: the new cafe owner
  hu TP: a kávézó új tulajdonosa
  EN FP: the new cafe cook
  hu FP: a kávézó új szakácsa
4912 | instructor (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: oktató
  EN TS: The instructor is kicking.
  hu TS: Az oktató rúg.
  EN FS: The instructor is dancing.
  hu FS: Az oktató táncol.
  EN TP: a karate instructor
  hu TP: egy karateoktató
  EN FP: a driving instructor
  hu FP: egy autósoktató
4913 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: karkötő
  EN TS: She is fastening a bracelet.
  hu TS: Karkötőt csatol fel.
  EN FS: She is fastening a necklace.
  hu FS: Nyakláncot csatol fel.
  EN TP: a woven beaded bracelet
  hu TP: fonott gyöngyös karkötő
  EN FP: buying a gold bracelet
  hu FP: aranykarkötő vásárlása
4914 | guitar (noun): a stringed instrument with six strings | loc: gitár
  EN TS: Everyone loves the guitar guy.
  hu TS: Mindenki imádja a gitáros srácot.
  EN FS: Everyone loves the drum guy.
  hu FS: Mindenki imádja a dobos srácot.
  EN TP: playing an acoustic guitar
  hu TP: akusztikus gitáron játszik
  EN FP: fixing an acoustic guitar
  hu FP: akusztikus gitárt javít
4915 | shoulder (noun): the body part between the neck and the arm | loc: váll
  EN TS: They are walking shoulder to shoulder.
  hu TS: Vállt vállnak vetve sétálnak.
  EN FS: They are sitting shoulder to shoulder.
  hu FS: Vállt vállnak vetve ülnek.
  EN TP: arms over shoulders
  hu TP: kar a vállakon
  EN FP: a bag on the shoulder
  hu FP: táska a vállon
4916 | bicycle (noun): a vehicle with two wheels moved by pedals | loc: kerékpár
  EN TS: We made it! Two bicycles, one sunset.
  hu TS: Megcsináltuk! Két kerékpár, egy naplemente.
  EN FS: We made it! Two scooters, one sunset.
  hu FS: Megcsináltuk! Két roller, egy naplemente.
  EN TP: bicycles on a pier
  hu TP: kerékpárok a mólón
  EN FP: bicycles on a train
  hu FP: kerékpárok a vonaton
4917 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: lőni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Red shot blue. Gotcha!
  hu TS: A piros lelőtte a kéket. Megvagy!
  EN FS: Blue shot red. Gotcha!
  hu FS: A kék lelőtte a pirosat. Megvagy!
  EN TP: shooting paint at a player
  hu TP: festéket lő egy játékosra
  EN FP: shooting a basketball
  hu FP: kosárra lő
4918 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: lépcső
  EN TS: He is climbing the stairs.
  hu TS: Felmegy a lépcsőn.
  EN FS: He is sliding down the stairs.
  hu FS: Lecsúszik a lépcsőn.
  EN TP: up the stairs with bags
  hu TP: fel a lépcsőn csomagokkal
  EN FP: down the stairs alone
  hu FP: le a lépcsőn egyedül
4919 | membership (noun): being a member of a group | loc: tagság
  EN TS: She signed up for membership.
  hu TS: Jelentkezett a tagságra.
  EN FS: She signed up for yoga.
  hu FS: Jelentkezett a jógára.
  EN TP: a photo club membership
  hu TP: fotóklub-tagság
  EN FP: a gym membership card
  hu FP: edzőtermi tagsági kártya
4920 | community (noun): people from one area who do things together | loc: közösség
  EN TS: The community is cheering!
  hu TS: A közösség ujjong!
  EN FS: The community is crying!
  hu FS: A közösség sír!
  EN TP: a community garden sign
  hu TP: közösségi kert táblája
  EN FP: an online community
  hu FP: online közösség
4921 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: ösvény
  EN TS: The trail is full of roots.
  hu TS: Az ösvény tele van gyökerekkel.
  EN FS: The trail is full of snow.
  hu FS: Az ösvény tele van hóval.
  EN TP: a rough forest trail
  hu TP: göröngyös erdei ösvény
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  hu FP: lábnyomok sora
4922 | host (noun): the person who invites guests and cares for them | loc: házigazda
  EN TS: The host welcomes his guests.
  hu TS: A házigazda üdvözli a vendégeit.
  EN FS: The host ignores his guests.
  hu FS: A házigazda levegőnek nézi a vendégeit.
  EN TP: a host raising his glass
  hu TP: poharát emelő házigazda
  EN FP: a talk show host
  hu FP: talkshow-műsorvezető
4923 | seat (verb): to show someone to a seat | loc: leültetni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is seating two guests.
  hu TS: Két vendéget ültet le.
  EN FS: She is seating four guests.
  hu FS: Négy vendéget ültet le.
  EN TP: seating a young couple
  hu TP: fiatal pár leültetése
  EN FP: seating herself at the bar
  hu FP: leül a bárpulthoz
4924 | familiar (adjective): easily recognized because you know it well | loc: ismerős
  EN TS: She sees a familiar face.
  hu TS: Ismerős arcot lát.
  EN FS: She sees a familiar dog.
  hu FS: Ismerős kutyát lát.
  EN TP: a familiar face
  hu TP: ismerős arc
  EN FP: a familiar song
  hu FP: ismerős dal
4925 | care (verb): to look after someone who needs care | loc: ápolni
  EN TS: She is caring for a patient.
  hu TS: Egy beteget ápol.
  EN FS: She is caring for a baby.
  hu FS: Egy kisbabát ápol.
  EN TP: caring for a hospital patient
  hu TP: kórházi beteg ápolása
  EN FP: caring for a garden
  hu FP: kert ápolása
4926 | dentist (noun): a person whose job is to fix and clean teeth | loc: fogorvos
  EN TS: The dentist has a mirror.
  hu TS: A fogorvosnál tükör van.
  EN FS: The dentist has a phone.
  hu FS: A fogorvosnál telefon van.
  EN TP: a dentist with a mirror
  hu TP: fogorvos tükörrel
  EN FP: a dentist pulling a tooth
  hu FP: fogat húzó fogorvos
4927 | lawyer (noun): a person whose job is to practice law | loc: ügyvéd
  EN TS: The lawyer is shaking hands.
  hu TS: Az ügyvéd kezet ráz.
  EN FS: The lawyer is holding hands.
  hu FS: Az ügyvéd valakinek a kezét fogja.
  EN TP: a lawyer with a briefcase
  hu TP: ügyvéd aktatáskával
  EN FP: a lawyer with a laptop
  hu FP: ügyvéd laptoppal
4928 | to fix (verb): to put something broken back together | loc: megjavítani | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He fixed the leak himself!
  hu TS: Egyedül javította meg a szivárgást!
  EN FS: He fixed the car himself!
  hu FS: Egyedül javította meg az autót!
  EN TP: fixing a leaking sink
  hu TP: csöpögő mosdó javítása
  EN FP: fixing a broken car
  hu FP: lerobbant autó javítása
4929 | grade (noun): the value your school work is given | loc: jegy
  EN TS: Guess who got a top grade!
  hu TS: Találd ki, ki kapta a legjobb jegyet!
  EN FS: Guess who got a bad grade!
  hu FS: Találd ki, ki kapott rossz jegyet!
  EN TP: a top grade
  hu TP: a legjobb jegy
  EN FP: a bad grade
  hu FP: rossz jegy
4930 | reward (noun): something you get for doing worthy acts | loc: jutalom
  EN TS: Her reward is a gold star!
  hu TS: A jutalma egy aranycsillag!
  EN FS: Her reward is a silver star!
  hu FS: A jutalma egy ezüstcsillag!
  EN TP: a gold star reward
  hu TP: aranycsillag jutalmul
  EN FP: a reward for lost keys
  hu FP: jutalom az elveszett kulcsokért
4931 | diagram (noun): a drawing that explains how something works | loc: ábra
  EN TS: She is explaining a diagram.
  hu TS: Egy ábrát magyaráz.
  EN FS: She is explaining a poem.
  hu FS: Egy verset magyaráz.
  EN TP: a chalk diagram
  hu TP: krétával rajzolt ábra
  EN FP: a textbook diagram
  hu FP: tankönyvi ábra
4932 | to steer (verb): to turn a wheel to control where a boat goes | loc: kormányozni
  EN TS: Cool cap! She is steering a taxi.
  hu TS: Menő sapka! Taxit kormányoz.
  EN FS: Cool cap! She is steering a boat.
  hu FS: Menő sapka! Hajót kormányoz.
  EN TP: steering a yellow taxi
  hu TP: sárga taxit kormányoz
  EN FP: steering a yellow boat
  hu FP: sárga hajót kormányoz
4933 | wheel (noun): a round frame that turns on an axle | loc: kerék
  EN TS: One hand stays on the wheel.
  hu TS: Egyik keze végig a kormánykeréken marad.
  EN FS: One hand stays on the phone.
  hu FS: Egyik keze végig a telefonon marad.
  EN TP: a bus steering wheel
  hu TP: busz kormánykereke
  EN FP: a bus spare wheel
  hu FP: busz pótkereke
4934 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: headset
  EN TS: She is putting on a headset.
  hu TS: Headsetet vesz fel.
  EN FS: She is putting on a helmet.
  hu FS: Sisakot vesz fel.
  EN TP: a green pilot headset
  hu TP: zöld pilóta-headset
  EN FP: a VR headset for games
  hu FP: VR-headset játékhoz
4935 | compass (noun): an instrument whose needle shows you north | loc: iránytű
  EN TS: She is touching the compass.
  hu TS: Megérinti az iránytűt.
  EN FS: She is touching the radio.
  hu FS: Megérinti a rádiót.
  EN TP: a brass ship's compass
  hu TP: réz hajóiránytű
  EN FP: a compass for drawing circles
  hu FP: körző körök rajzolásához
4936 | kitchen (noun): a room equipped for preparing meals | loc: konyha
  EN TS: She is cooking in a kitchen.
  hu TS: Egy konyhában főz.
  EN FS: She is cooking in a garden.
  hu FS: Egy kertben főz.
  EN TP: a professional kitchen
  hu TP: profi konyha
  EN FP: a home kitchen
  hu FP: otthoni konyha
4937 | ring (verb): to sound loudly, like a bell | loc: csengeni | translator note: used csenget (transitive form of cseng/csengeni)
  EN TS: He is ringing the bell.
  hu TS: Csenget a pultcsengővel.
  EN FS: He is ringing the doorbell.
  hu FS: Csenget a kapucsengővel.
  EN TP: ringing the service bell
  hu TP: csenget a pultnál
  EN FP: ringing a friend
  hu FP: felhívja egy barátját
4938 | waitress (noun): a woman who serves food to guests in a restaurant | loc: pincérnő
  EN TS: She's a busy waitress.
  hu TS: Ez egy nagyon elfoglalt pincérnő.
  EN FS: She's a busy nurse.
  hu FS: Ez egy nagyon elfoglalt ápolónő.
  EN TP: a waitress on a terrace
  hu TP: pincérnő a teraszon
  EN FP: a waitress in a kitchen
  hu FP: pincérnő a konyhában
4939 | golden (adjective): shining with the bright yellow colour of gold | loc: aranyszínű
  EN TS: Golden crust. Nice work, baker.
  hu TS: Aranyszínű héj. Szép munka, pék!
  EN FS: Burnt crust. Great work, baker.
  hu FS: Égett héj. Remek munka, pék!
  EN TP: golden brown croissants
  hu TP: aranyszínű croissant-ok
  EN FP: a golden wedding ring
  hu FP: aranyszínű jegygyűrű
4940 | butcher (noun): a person who cuts and sells meat | loc: hentes
  EN TS: The butcher is wrapping meat.
  hu TS: A hentes húst csomagol.
  EN FS: The butcher is wrapping gifts.
  hu FS: A hentes ajándékokat csomagol.
  EN TP: a butcher wrapping steak
  hu TP: steaket csomagoló hentes
  EN FP: a butcher cutting chicken
  hu FP: csirkét daraboló hentes
4941 | firefighter (noun): a person whose job is putting out fires | loc: tűzoltó
  EN TS: The firefighter saved a cat!
  hu TS: A tűzoltó megmentett egy macskát!
  EN FS: The firefighter saved a dog!
  hu FS: A tűzoltó megmentett egy kutyát!
  EN TP: a firefighter saving a cat
  hu TP: macskát mentő tűzoltó
  EN FP: a firefighter fighting a fire
  hu FP: tüzet oltó tűzoltó
4942 | luggage (noun): bags you carry your things in when traveling | loc: poggyász
  EN TS: One bag of luggage? Legend!
  hu TS: Egy táska az egész poggyász? Legenda!
  EN FS: Five bags of luggage? Legend!
  hu FS: Öt táska az egész poggyász? Legenda!
  EN TP: luggage over his shoulder
  hu TP: poggyász a vállán
  EN FP: luggage on a trolley
  hu FP: poggyász egy csomagkocsin
4943 | praise (noun): words or clapping that show approval | loc: dicséret
  EN TS: He loves all this praise.
  hu TS: Imádja ezt a sok dicséretet.
  EN FS: He hates all this praise.
  hu FS: Utálja ezt a sok dicséretet.
  EN TP: praise from the film crew
  hu TP: dicséret a stábtól
  EN FP: praise from his teacher
  hu FP: dicséret a tanárától
4944 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: báli ruha
  EN TS: Spotlight, roses and a gold gown!
  hu TS: Reflektorfény, rózsák és egy arany báli ruha!
  EN FS: Spotlight, roses and a red gown!
  hu FS: Reflektorfény, rózsák és egy piros báli ruha!
  EN TP: a long pale-gold gown
  hu TP: hosszú halványarany báli ruha
  EN FP: trying on a wedding gown
  hu FP: menyasszonyi ruha felpróbálása
4945 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: énekelni
  EN TS: She is singing into the mic.
  hu TS: A mikrofonba énekel.
  EN FS: She is singing into a phone.
  hu FS: Egy telefonba énekel.
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  hu TP: mikrofonba énekel
  EN FP: singing in a choir
  hu FP: kórusban énekel
4946 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: lófarok
  EN TS: Her ponytail is dancing too.
  hu TS: A lófarka is táncol.
  EN FS: Her scarf is dancing too.
  hu FS: A sálja is táncol.
  EN TP: a swinging ponytail
  hu TP: lengő lófarok
  EN FP: a ponytail under a cap
  hu FP: lófarok sapka alatt
4947 | portrait (noun): a picture that shows a person's face | loc: portré
  EN TS: Portrait done. Arms up!
  hu TS: Kész a portré. Kezek a magasba!
  EN FS: Landscape done. Arms up!
  hu FS: Kész a tájkép. Kezek a magasba!
  EN TP: a finished portrait
  hu TP: elkészült portré
  EN FP: a portrait of a cat
  hu FP: macskaportré
4948 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: városi látkép
  EN TS: Make-up with a skyline view. Fancy.
  hu TS: Sminkelés városi látképpel. Puccos.
  EN FS: Make-up with a beach view. Fancy.
  hu FS: Sminkelés tengerparti kilátással. Puccos.
  EN TP: a city skyline behind her
  hu TP: városi látkép mögötte
  EN FP: a skyline at sunset
  hu FP: városi látkép naplementekor
4949 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: tájkép
  EN TS: Snowy peaks: amazing scenery.
  hu TS: Havas csúcsok: csodás tájkép.
  EN FS: Sandy dunes: amazing scenery.
  hu FS: Homokdűnék: csodás tájkép.
  EN TP: mountain scenery from the top
  hu TP: hegyi tájkép a csúcsról
  EN FP: scenery from a train window
  hu FP: tájkép a vonatablakból
4950 | hip (noun): the part where the leg joins the waist | loc: csípő
  EN TS: Hands on hips. Very serious.
  hu TS: Kéz a csípőn. Nagyon komoly.
  EN FS: Hands on heads. Very serious.
  hu FS: Kéz a fejen. Nagyon komoly.
  EN TP: hands on the hips
  hu TP: kezek a csípőn
  EN FP: swinging the hips
  hu FP: csípőringatás
4951 | home (adverb): to the place where your home is | loc: haza
  EN TS: He is home, and the dog is happy!
  hu TS: Hazaért, és a kutya boldog!
  EN FS: He is home, and the cat is happy!
  hu FS: Hazaért, és a macska boldog!
  EN TP: coming home to the dog
  hu TP: hazaérkezés a kutyához
  EN FP: leaving home for work
  hu FP: munkába indul hazulról
4952 | bed (noun): the piece of furniture you sleep on | loc: ágy
  EN TS: He missed his bed so much.
  hu TS: Nagyon hiányzott neki az ágya.
  EN FS: He missed his car so much.
  hu FS: Nagyon hiányzott neki az autója.
  EN TP: dropping onto the bed
  hu TP: ledől az ágyra
  EN FP: making the bed
  hu FP: beveti az ágyat
4953 | hope (verb): to wish for something and expect it to happen | loc: remélni
  EN TS: She is hoping for photosynthesis.
  hu TS: Fotoszintézist remél.
  EN FS: She is hoping for a thunderstorm.
  hu FS: Zivatart remél.
  EN TP: hoping for a sprout
  hu TP: csírát remél
  EN FP: hoping for a rainbow
  hu FP: szivárványt remél
4954 | visit (noun): going to see someone for a short time | loc: látogatás
  EN TS: The visit makes her so happy!
  hu TS: A látogatás nagyon boldoggá teszi!
  EN FS: The visit makes her so sad!
  hu FS: A látogatás nagyon szomorúvá teszi!
  EN TP: a hospital visit
  hu TP: kórházi látogatás
  EN FP: a visit to the zoo
  hu FP: állatkerti látogatás
4955 | locker (noun): a storage box for your clothes and valuables | loc: szekrény
  EN TS: Only the lockers look tidy here.
  hu TS: Itt csak a szekrények rendesek.
  EN FS: Only the bunk beds look tidy here.
  hu FS: Itt csak az emeletes ágyak rendesek.
  EN TP: a row of grey lockers
  hu TP: szürke öltözőszekrények sora
  EN FP: a locker at a pool
  hu FP: szekrény az uszodában
4956 | reception (noun): the front desk where guests check in | loc: recepció
  EN TS: She is walking to reception.
  hu TS: A recepcióhoz sétál.
  EN FS: She is walking to the kitchen.
  hu FS: A konyhához sétál.
  EN TP: the hostel reception desk
  hu TP: a hostel recepciós pultja
  EN FP: a wedding reception
  hu FP: esküvői fogadás
4957 | hotel (noun): a building where travelers pay to stay | loc: szálloda
  EN TS: Hotel prices range from cheap to 2,000 EUR.
  hu TS: A szállodaárak az olcsótól 2000 euróig terjednek.
  EN FS: Hotel prices range from cheap to 20 EUR.
  hu FS: A szállodaárak az olcsótól 20 euróig terjednek.
  EN TP: three kinds of hotel
  hu TP: háromféle szálloda
  EN FP: a hotel by the sea
  hu FP: szálloda a tengerparton
4958 | villa (noun): a large, expensive house with a garden | loc: villa
  EN TS: From a hut to a glass villa!
  hu TS: Kunyhóból üvegvillába!
  EN FS: From a hut to a wooden villa!
  hu FS: Kunyhóból favillába!
  EN TP: a huge glass villa
  hu TP: hatalmas üvegvilla
  EN FP: a holiday villa for rent
  hu FP: kiadó nyaralóvilla
4959 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: házikó
  EN TS: A cottage with a sunflower.
  hu TS: Házikó napraforgóval.
  EN FS: A cottage with an apple tree.
  hu FS: Házikó almafával.
  EN TP: a small wooden cottage
  hu TP: kis faházikó
  EN FP: a cottage by a lake
  hu FP: házikó a tóparton
4960 | cuddle (verb): to hold someone close in a soft, loving way | loc: ölelgetni
  EN TS: They are cuddling at arrivals!
  hu TS: Ölelgetik egymást az érkezési csarnokban!
  EN FS: They are fighting at arrivals!
  hu FS: Verekednek az érkezési csarnokban!
  EN TP: a group cuddle at arrivals
  hu TP: csoportos ölelgetés az érkezőknél
  EN FP: cuddling a teddy bear
  hu FP: plüssmaci ölelgetése
4961 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: háziállat
  EN TS: The pet is hunting a toy.
  hu TS: A háziállat egy játékra vadászik.
  EN FS: The pet is hunting a ball.
  hu FS: A háziállat egy labdára vadászik.
  EN TP: a pet cat hunting
  hu TP: vadászó háziállat
  EN FP: a pet cat sleeping
  hu FP: alvó háziállat
4962 | binoculars (noun): double lenses for seeing far-away things | loc: távcső
  EN TS: He is using binoculars. Deer alert!
  hu TS: Távcsövet használ. Szarvasriadó!
  EN FS: He is using a telescope. Deer alert!
  hu FS: Teleszkópot használ. Szarvasriadó!
  EN TP: looking through binoculars
  hu TP: távcsövön át néz
  EN FP: binoculars at the opera
  hu FP: távcső az operában
4963 | finger (noun): any of the long parts on your hand, not the thumb | loc: ujj
  EN TS: She hurt her finger, then her toe!
  hu TS: Megütötte az ujját, aztán a lábujját!
  EN FS: She hurt her finger, then her ear!
  hu FS: Megütötte az ujját, aztán a fülét!
  EN TP: a hurt finger
  hu TP: sérült ujj
  EN FP: pointing a finger at him
  hu FP: ujjal mutogat rá
4964 | to taste (verb): to taste a little of something | loc: megkóstolni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Soup to taste, then flowers. Smooth.
  hu TS: Levest kóstolni, utána virág. Ügyes húzás.
  EN FS: Soup to taste, then chocolate. Smooth.
  hu FS: Levest kóstolni, utána csoki. Ügyes húzás.
  EN TP: tasting soup from a spoon
  hu TP: levest kóstol a kanálról
  EN FP: tasting wine at a party
  hu FP: bort kóstol egy buliban
4965 | bathroom (noun): a room with a bath or shower and a washbasin | loc: fürdőszoba
  EN TS: The bathroom routine is done.
  hu TS: A fürdőszobai rutin kész.
  EN FS: The kitchen routine is done.
  hu FS: A konyhai rutin kész.
  EN TP: brushing teeth in the bathroom
  hu TP: fogmosás a fürdőszobában
  EN FP: singing in the bathroom
  hu FP: éneklés a fürdőszobában
4966 | split (verb): to separate something into parts | loc: széthasítani | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The ice split in two.
  hu TS: A jég két darabra hasadt szét.
  EN FS: The ice split in three.
  hu FS: A jég három darabra hasadt szét.
  EN TP: splitting a slab of ice
  hu TP: jégtábla széthasítása
  EN FP: splitting a log of wood
  hu FP: farönk széthasítása
4967 | identity (noun): the characteristics by which a person is known | loc: személyazonosság
  EN TS: A scan checks her identity.
  hu TS: Egy szkenner ellenőrzi a személyazonosságát.
  EN FS: A scan checks her luggage.
  hu FS: Egy szkenner ellenőrzi a poggyászát.
  EN TP: checking her identity
  hu TP: személyazonosság ellenőrzése
  EN FP: hiding her identity
  hu FP: személyazonosság elrejtése
4968 | card (noun): a card that shows your identity | loc: kártya
  EN TS: She got her new ID card!
  hu TS: Megkapta az új személyi kártyáját!
  EN FS: She got her new phone!
  hu FS: Megkapta az új telefonját!
  EN TP: a new identity card
  hu TP: új személyazonosító kártya
  EN FP: a new birthday card
  hu FP: új születésnapi kártya
4969 | cafe (noun): a small restaurant selling drinks and snacks | loc: kávézó
  EN TS: At the cafe, her book wins.
  hu TS: A kávézóban nála a könyv nyer.
  EN FS: At the cafe, his phone wins.
  hu FS: A kávézóban nála a telefon nyer.
  EN TP: reading at a cafe table
  hu TP: olvasás egy kávézóasztalnál
  EN FP: working in a cafe kitchen
  hu FP: munka egy kávézó konyháján
4970 | independence (noun): freedom from the control of others | loc: függetlenség
  EN TS: Fireworks for independence!
  hu TS: Tűzijáték a függetlenségért!
  EN FS: Candles for independence!
  hu FS: Gyertyák a függetlenségért!
  EN TP: celebrating independence
  hu TP: a függetlenség ünneplése
  EN FP: fighting for independence
  hu FP: harc a függetlenségért
4971 | fireworks (noun): things that explode in the sky with colour | loc: tűzijáték
  EN TS: Fireworks light up the dome.
  hu TS: Tűzijáték világítja meg a kupolát.
  EN FS: Fireworks light up the bridge.
  hu FS: Tűzijáték világítja meg a hidat.
  EN TP: fireworks over a dome
  hu TP: tűzijáték egy kupola felett
  EN FP: fireworks over a lake
  hu FP: tűzijáték egy tó felett
4972 | patriotic (adjective): inspired by love for your country | loc: hazafias
  EN TS: What a patriotic night!
  hu TS: Micsoda hazafias este!
  EN FS: What a patriotic morning!
  hu FS: Micsoda hazafias reggel!
  EN TP: a patriotic crowd
  hu TP: hazafias tömeg
  EN FP: a patriotic army parade
  hu FP: hazafias katonai parádé
4973 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: emlékmű
  EN TS: He is posing at a monument.
  hu TS: Egy emlékműnél pózol.
  EN FS: He is posing at a waterfall.
  hu FS: Egy vízesésnél pózol.
  EN TP: posing at a white monument
  hu TP: póz egy fehér emlékműnél
  EN FP: a monument on a mountain
  hu FP: emlékmű egy hegyen
4974 | seller (noun): someone who exchanges goods for money | loc: eladó
  EN TS: The seller is pouring like a pro.
  hu TS: Az eladó profin tölt.
  EN FS: The seller is juggling like a pro.
  hu FS: Az eladó profin zsonglőrködik.
  EN TP: a tea seller pouring
  hu TP: teát töltő eladó
  EN FP: a seller of flowers
  hu FP: virágeladó
4975 | different (adjective): unlike something else in nature or quality | loc: más
  EN TS: Her style is so different!
  hu TS: A csaj stílusa annyira más!
  EN FS: His style is so different!
  hu FS: A srác stílusa annyira más!
  EN TP: different from the crowd
  hu TP: más, mint a tömeg
  EN FP: different from her sister
  hu FP: más, mint a nővére
4976 | wade (verb): to walk through shallow water | loc: gázolni
  EN TS: He is wading through water.
  hu TS: Vízben gázol.
  EN FS: He is wading through snow.
  hu FS: Hóban gázol.
  EN TP: wading in rice fields
  hu TP: gázolás a rizsföldeken
  EN FP: wading in deep snow
  hu FP: gázolás mély hóban
4977 | hand (noun): the end of the limb you grab things with | loc: kéz
  EN TS: A hand is leading the way.
  hu TS: Egy kéz mutatja az utat.
  EN FS: A dog is leading the way.
  hu FS: Egy kutya mutatja az utat.
  EN TP: an outstretched open hand
  hu TP: kinyújtott nyitott kéz
  EN FP: a hand full of rice
  hu FP: rizzsel teli kéz
4978 | cook (noun): someone who cooks food | loc: szakács
  EN TS: The cook is playing with fire!
  hu TS: A szakács a tűzzel játszik!
  EN FS: The cook is playing with ice!
  hu FS: A szakács a jéggel játszik!
  EN TP: a cook at a wok
  hu TP: szakács a woknál
  EN FP: a cook at a grill
  hu FP: szakács a grillnél
4979 | office (noun): a place of business where people do office work | loc: iroda
  EN TS: The whole office is sick!
  hu TS: Az egész iroda beteg!
  EN FS: The whole office is asleep!
  hu FS: Az egész iroda alszik!
  EN TP: coughing in the office
  hu TP: köhögés az irodában
  EN FP: singing in the office
  hu FP: éneklés az irodában
4980 | to breathe (verb): to draw air into your lungs and let it out | loc: lélegezni
  EN TS: They are breathing in deeply.
  hu TS: Mélyen lélegeznek be.
  EN FS: They are shouting out loudly.
  hu FS: Hangosan kiabálnak.
  EN TP: to breathe in fresh air
  hu TP: friss levegőt lélegezni
  EN FP: to breathe under water
  hu FP: víz alatt lélegezni
4981 | vaccine (noun): an injection that protects you from a disease | loc: vakcina
  EN TS: Everyone got the vaccine. Yay!
  hu TS: Mindenki megkapta a vakcinát. Hurrá!
  EN FS: Nobody got the vaccine. Yay!
  hu FS: Senki nem kapta meg a vakcinát. Hurrá!
  EN TP: vaccines in upper arms
  hu TP: vakcina a felkarba
  EN FP: a vaccine in the leg
  hu FP: vakcina a lábba
4982 | ankle (noun): the joint between your leg and your foot | loc: boka
  EN TS: He is holding his ankle.
  hu TS: A bokáját fogja.
  EN FS: He is holding his head.
  hu FS: A fejét fogja.
  EN TP: a hurt ankle
  hu TP: sérült boka
  EN FP: a bracelet on the ankle
  hu FP: karkötő a bokán
4983 | officer (noun): a person who holds a position of authority | loc: tiszt
  EN TS: The officer is checking everything, even under the van.
  hu TS: A tiszt mindent átvizsgál, még a furgon alját is.
  EN FS: The officer is checking everything, even under the bus.
  hu FS: A tiszt mindent átvizsgál, még a busz alját is.
  EN TP: an officer checking a van
  hu TP: furgont ellenőrző tiszt
  EN FP: an officer on a ship
  hu FP: tiszt egy hajón
4984 | briefcase (noun): a stiff flat case for carrying papers | loc: aktatáska
  EN TS: Briefcase in hand, he's skating!
  hu TS: Aktatáskával a kézben korcsolyázik!
  EN FS: Coffee cup in hand, he's skating!
  hu FS: Kávéspohárral a kézben korcsolyázik!
  EN TP: skating with a briefcase
  hu TP: korcsolyázás aktatáskával
  EN FP: a briefcase full of papers
  hu FP: papírokkal teli aktatáska
4985 | fix (verb): to attach something firmly in place | loc: rögzíteni
  EN TS: The screens are fixed in place.
  hu TS: A képernyők rögzítve vannak.
  EN FS: The mirrors are fixed in place.
  hu FS: A tükrök rögzítve vannak.
  EN TP: fixing screens to the wall
  hu TP: képernyők falra rögzítése
  EN FP: fixing a meeting date
  hu FP: megbeszélés időpontjának rögzítése
4986 | bright (adjective): giving off a lot of light | loc: világos
  EN TS: The wall is a bit bright.
  hu TS: A fal kicsit világos.
  EN FS: The wall is a bit dark.
  hu FS: A fal kicsit sötét.
  EN TP: bright blue screens
  hu TP: világos kék képernyők
  EN FP: a bright sunny day
  hu FP: napsütéses világos nap
4987 | present (verb): to give an exhibition of work to an audience | loc: bemutatni
  EN TS: She presented. Coffee won.
  hu TS: Bemutatta a projektet. A kávé nyert.
  EN FS: She presented. Pizza won.
  hu FS: Bemutatta a projektet. A pizza nyert.
  EN TP: presenting her work
  hu TP: bemutatja a munkáját
  EN FP: presenting a TV show
  hu FP: tévéműsort vezet
4988 | attack (noun): a military move against an enemy with weapons | loc: támadás
  EN TS: The attack is starting!
  hu TS: Kezdődik a támadás!
  EN FS: The picnic is starting!
  hu FS: Kezdődik a piknik!
  EN TP: a medieval attack
  hu TP: középkori támadás
  EN FP: a heart attack
  hu FP: szívroham
4989 | hill (noun): a raised piece of land, smaller than a mountain | loc: domb
  EN TS: They are storming down the hill!
  hu TS: Lerohannak a dombról!
  EN FS: They are storming down the road!
  hu FS: Lerohannak az úton!
  EN TP: charging down a hill
  hu TP: roham lefelé a dombon
  EN FP: rolling down a hill
  hu FP: gurulás lefelé a dombon
4990 | iron (noun): the hot tool for pressing clothes smooth | loc: vasaló
  EN TS: He is using a heavy iron.
  hu TS: Nehéz vasalót használ.
  EN FS: He is using a heavy hammer.
  hu FS: Nehéz kalapácsot használ.
  EN TP: a heavy steam iron
  hu TP: nehéz gőzölős vasaló
  EN FP: an iron pan
  hu FP: vasserpenyő
4991 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: kócos | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc kócos means messy hair only; used rendetlen
  EN TS: What a messy pile of clothes!
  hu TS: Micsoda rendetlen ruhakupac!
  EN FS: What a messy pile of books!
  hu FS: Micsoda rendetlen könyvkupac!
  EN TP: a messy pile of clothes
  hu TP: rendetlen ruhakupac
  EN FP: a messy kitchen table
  hu FP: rendetlen konyhaasztal
4992 | busy (adjective): fully occupied with what you are doing | loc: elfoglalt
  EN TS: So much ironing! She is busy.
  hu TS: Annyi vasalnivaló! Nagyon elfoglalt.
  EN FS: So much cooking! She is busy.
  hu FS: Annyi főznivaló! Nagyon elfoglalt.
  EN TP: busy with the ironing
  hu TP: a vasalással elfoglalt
  EN FP: busy with the dishes
  hu FP: a mosogatással elfoglalt
4993 | alone (adjective): kept apart from others, on your own | loc: egyedül
  EN TS: She is all alone on the lake.
  hu TS: Teljesen egyedül van a tavon.
  EN FS: She is all alone on the beach.
  hu FS: Teljesen egyedül van a tengerparton.
  EN TP: alone on a tiny island
  hu TP: egyedül egy apró szigeten
  EN FP: alone in a big city
  hu FP: egyedül egy nagyvárosban
4994 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: fa
  EN TS: She is using a wooden spoon.
  hu TS: Fakanalat használ.
  EN FS: She is using a metal spoon.
  hu FS: Fémkanalat használ.
  EN TP: a long wooden spoon
  hu TP: hosszú fakanál
  EN FP: a wooden chopping board
  hu FP: fa vágódeszka
4995 | sculpture (noun): a three-dimensional work of art | loc: szobor
  EN TS: A fountain with a sculpture.
  hu TS: Szökőkút szoborral.
  EN FS: A fountain with a clock.
  hu FS: Szökőkút órával.
  EN TP: a stone fountain sculpture
  hu TP: kőszobros szökőkút
  EN FP: a wedding ice sculpture
  hu FP: esküvői jégszobor
4996 | cone (noun): any cone-shaped object you can hold | loc: tölcsér
  EN TS: Pigeons love her ice cream cone.
  hu TS: A galambok imádják a fagyitölcsérét.
  EN FS: Seagulls love her ice cream cone.
  hu FS: A sirályok imádják a fagyitölcsérét.
  EN TP: an ice cream cone
  hu TP: fagyitölcsér
  EN FP: an orange traffic cone
  hu FP: narancssárga terelőkúp
4997 | laugh (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: nevetés
  EN TS: He has a loud laugh.
  hu TS: Hangos a nevetése.
  EN FS: He has a quiet laugh.
  hu FS: Halk a nevetése.
  EN TP: a laugh at the Colosseum
  hu TP: nevetés a Colosseumnál
  EN FP: a laugh in Paris
  hu FP: nevetés Párizsban
4998 | tunnel (noun): a passage cut under the ground for traffic | loc: alagút
  EN TS: The tunnel is made of gates.
  hu TS: Az alagút kapukból áll.
  EN FS: The tunnel is made of trees.
  hu FS: Az alagút fákból áll.
  EN TP: a tunnel of shrine gates
  hu TP: szentélykapukból álló alagút
  EN FP: a tunnel under the sea
  hu FP: alagút a tenger alatt
4999 | combat (verb): to battle against someone in a fight | loc: harcolni
  EN TS: He's combating a swordsman.
  hu TS: Egy kardforgatóval harcol.
  EN FS: He's combating an archer.
  hu FS: Egy íjásszal harcol.
  EN TP: combating a swordsman
  hu TP: harc egy kardforgatóval
  EN FP: combating a bad cold
  hu FP: harc egy csúnya megfázással
5000 | thin (adjective): not thick from one surface to the other | loc: vékony
  EN TS: His thin slices look perfect.
  hu TS: Tökéletesek a vékony szeletei.
  EN FS: His thick slices look perfect.
  hu FS: Tökéletesek a vastag szeletei.
  EN TP: thin slices of fish
  hu TP: vékony halszeletek
  EN FP: thin slices of bread
  hu FP: vékony kenyérszeletek
5001 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: tájkép
  EN TS: Worth it for this landscape.
  hu TS: Megérte ezért a tájképért.
  EN FS: Worth it for this beach.
  hu FS: Megérte ezért a strandért.
  EN TP: a mountain landscape
  hu TP: hegyi tájkép
  EN FP: a landscape painting
  hu FP: tájképfestmény
5002 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: szürkület
  EN TS: They are jumping in at dusk.
  hu TS: Szürkületkor ugranak be.
  EN FS: They are jumping in at noon.
  hu FS: Délben ugranak be.
  EN TP: a forest lake at dusk
  hu TP: erdei tó szürkületkor
  EN FP: dusk in a big city
  hu FP: szürkület a nagyvárosban
5003 | explorer (noun): someone who travels into little known places | loc: felfedező
  EN TS: An explorer is cutting a path.
  hu TS: Egy felfedező utat vág magának.
  EN FS: An explorer is cutting a tree.
  hu FS: Egy felfedező fát vág.
  EN TP: an explorer with a machete
  hu TP: felfedező machetével
  EN FP: an explorer with a map
  hu FP: felfedező térképpel
5004 | spring (verb): to move forward in big leaps | loc: ugrani | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The kangaroo is springing forward.
  hu TS: A kenguru előre ugrik.
  EN FS: The kangaroo is springing backward.
  hu FS: A kenguru hátra ugrik.
  EN TP: to spring across the sand
  hu TP: ugrani a homokon át
  EN FP: to spring out of bed
  hu FP: kiugrani az ágyból
5005 | bay (noun): a part of the sea curving into the land | loc: öböl
  EN TS: She sees everything in this bay.
  hu TS: Ebben az öbölben mindent lát.
  EN FS: She sees everything in this park.
  hu FS: Ebben a parkban mindent lát.
  EN TP: boats in a quiet bay
  hu TP: hajók egy csendes öbölben
  EN FP: a bay full of ice
  hu FP: jéggel teli öböl
5006 | kettle (noun): the pot you boil water in for tea or coffee | loc: vízforraló
  EN TS: Her kettle is working hard.
  hu TS: Keményen dolgozik a vízforralója.
  EN FS: Her toaster is working hard.
  hu FS: Keményen dolgozik a kenyérpirítója.
  EN TP: boiling water in a kettle
  hu TP: víz forr a vízforralóban
  EN FP: a kettle on a fire
  hu FP: vízforraló a tűzön
5007 | lock (noun): a fastener on a door that keeps it closed | loc: zár
  EN TS: Yes! Her key is in the lock!
  hu TS: Igen! A kulcsa a zárban van!
  EN FS: Yes! Her key is in the car!
  hu FS: Igen! A kulcsa az autóban van!
  EN TP: a key in the lock
  hu TP: kulcs a zárban
  EN FP: a lock on a bike
  hu FP: zár egy biciklin
5008 | unlock (verb): to open the lock of something with a key | loc: kinyitni
  EN TS: She unlocked the wooden door.
  hu TS: Kinyitotta a faajtót.
  EN FS: She unlocked the garage door.
  hu FS: Kinyitotta a garázsajtót.
  EN TP: to unlock the wooden door
  hu TP: kinyitni a faajtót
  EN FP: to unlock a phone
  hu FP: feloldani egy telefont
5009 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: gyerek
  EN TS: The child is sliding down.
  hu TS: A gyerek lecsúszik.
  EN FS: The child is climbing up.
  hu FS: A gyerek felmászik.
  EN TP: a child on a slide
  hu TP: gyerek a csúszdán
  EN FP: a child on a swing
  hu FP: gyerek a hintán
5010 | king (noun): a man who rules a kingdom | loc: király
  EN TS: Long live the king!
  hu TS: Éljen a király!
  EN FS: Long live the queen!
  hu FS: Éljen a királynő!
  EN TP: a king on a balcony
  hu TP: király egy erkélyen
  EN FP: a king on a horse
  hu FP: király lóháton
5011 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: öreg
  EN TS: The old couple is kissing, how cute!
  hu TS: Az öreg pár csókolózik, de cuki!
  EN FS: The old couple is dancing, how cute!
  hu FS: Az öreg pár táncol, de cuki!
  EN TP: an old couple kissing
  hu TP: csókolózó öreg pár
  EN FP: an old couple dancing
  hu FP: táncoló öreg pár
5012 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: románc
  EN TS: Paris is full of romance!
  hu TS: Párizs tele van románccal!
  EN FS: Paris is full of snow!
  hu FS: Párizs tele van hóval!
  EN TP: romance in Paris
  hu TP: románc Párizsban
  EN FP: a romance novel
  hu FP: romantikus regény
5013 | cheap (adjective): low in price, not costing much | loc: olcsó
  EN TS: The cheap kitchen is old.
  hu TS: Az olcsó konyha régi.
  EN FS: The cheap kitchen is huge.
  hu FS: Az olcsó konyha hatalmas.
  EN TP: a cheap old kitchen
  hu TP: olcsó, régi konyha
  EN FP: a cheap fast car
  hu FP: olcsó, gyors autó
5014 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: gazdag
  EN TS: The rich cook has the best view.
  hu TS: A gazdag szakácsnak van a legjobb kilátása.
  EN FS: The rich cook has the best dog.
  hu FS: A gazdag szakácsnak van a legjobb kutyája.
  EN TP: a rich man's kitchen
  hu TP: egy gazdag ember konyhája
  EN FP: a rich man's car
  hu FP: egy gazdag ember autója
5015 | homemade (adjective): made at home by yourself, not bought | loc: házi
  EN TS: Homemade bread, made by hand.
  hu TS: Házi kenyér, kézzel gyúrva.
  EN FS: Homemade pasta, made by hand.
  hu FS: Házi tészta, kézzel gyúrva.
  EN TP: a homemade loaf of bread
  hu TP: házi kenyércipó
  EN FP: homemade jam in jars
  hu FP: házi lekvár üvegekben
5016 | knee (noun): the joint in the middle of your leg | loc: térd
  EN TS: He is bending his knees.
  hu TS: Behajlítja a térdét.
  EN FS: He is bending his arms.
  hu FS: Behajlítja a karját.
  EN TP: bare knees in a squat
  hu TP: csupasz térdek guggolásban
  EN FP: down on one knee
  hu FP: fél térdre ereszkedve
5017 | cut (adjective): separated into pieces with a sharp knife | loc: felvágott
  EN TS: A rainbow of cut vegetables!
  hu TS: Felvágott zöldségek szivárványa!
  EN FS: A rainbow of cut fruit!
  hu FS: Felvágott gyümölcsök szivárványa!
  EN TP: cut vegetables in rows
  hu TP: felvágott zöldségek sorokban
  EN FP: cut flowers in a vase
  hu FP: vágott virágok vázában
5018 | tasty (adjective): pleasing to the sense of taste | loc: ízletes
  EN TS: That meal looks so tasty!
  hu TS: Az a kaja nagyon ízletesnek tűnik!
  EN FS: That soup looks so tasty!
  hu FS: Az a leves nagyon ízletesnek tűnik!
  EN TP: a tasty bowl of rice
  hu TP: ízletes tál rizs
  EN FP: a tasty slice of cake
  hu FP: ízletes szelet torta
5019 | beef (noun): meat from an adult cow | loc: marhahús
  EN TS: She is grilling beef.
  hu TS: Marhahúst grillez.
  EN FS: She is grilling fish.
  hu FS: Halat grillez.
  EN TP: slices of grilled beef
  hu TP: grillezett marhahús szeletek
  EN FP: a beef burger with fries
  hu FP: marhahúsburger sült krumplival
5020 | replace (verb): to put a new thing in place of a broken one | loc: kicserélni
  EN TS: Two people to replace one bulb!
  hu TS: Két ember kell egy izzó kicseréléséhez!
  EN FS: Five people to replace one bulb!
  hu FS: Öt ember kell egy izzó kicseréléséhez!
  EN TP: replacing a dead bulb
  hu TP: kiégett izzó kicserélése
  EN FP: replacing a flat tyre
  hu FP: defektes gumi kicserélése
5021 | lady (noun): a polite name for any woman | loc: hölgy
  EN TS: Such an elegant lady pouring tea.
  hu TS: Milyen elegáns hölgy tölti a teát.
  EN FS: Such an elegant lady pouring wine.
  hu FS: Milyen elegáns hölgy tölti a bort.
  EN TP: a lady in a bonnet
  hu TP: hölgy főkötőben
  EN FP: a lady on a horse
  hu FP: hölgy lóháton
5022 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: ragyogni
  EN TS: The chandelier is shining!
  hu TS: Ragyog a csillár!
  EN FS: The mirror is shining!
  hu FS: Ragyog a tükör!
  EN TP: a shining chandelier
  hu TP: ragyogó csillár
  EN FP: shining shoes
  hu FP: ragyogó cipő
5023 | airplane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings, powered by jets | loc: repülőgép
  EN TS: He is cheering at an airplane!
  hu TS: Egy repülőgépnek ujjong!
  EN FS: He is cheering at a train!
  hu FS: Egy vonatnak ujjong!
  EN TP: an airplane landing low
  hu TP: alacsonyan leszálló repülőgép
  EN FP: an airplane taking off
  hu FP: felszálló repülőgép
5024 | dictionary (noun): a book that lists words and what they mean | loc: szótár
  EN TS: She has all the dictionaries!
  hu TS: Nála van az összes szótár!
  EN FS: She has all the cookbooks!
  hu FS: Nála van az összes szakácskönyv!
  EN TP: a stack of dictionaries
  hu TP: egy halom szótár
  EN FP: a dictionary app
  hu FP: szótáralkalmazás
5025 | joke (noun): a funny remark that causes laughter | loc: vicc
  EN TS: OMG, this joke is too funny!
  hu TS: OMG, ez a vicc túl vicces!
  EN FS: OMG, this lesson is too funny!
  hu FS: OMG, ez a tanóra túl vicces!
  EN TP: a joke on a phone
  hu TP: vicc a telefonon
  EN FP: a joke from the teacher
  hu FP: vicc a tanártól
5026 | hilarious (adjective): very funny, causing wild laughter | loc: nagyon vicces
  EN TS: His phone is hilarious today.
  hu TS: Ma nagyon vicces a telefonja.
  EN FS: His book is hilarious today.
  hu FS: Ma nagyon vicces a könyve.
  EN TP: hilarious in a lecture
  hu TP: nagyon vicces egy előadáson
  EN FP: hilarious at a wedding
  hu FP: nagyon vicces egy esküvőn
5027 | judge (noun): an official who settles questions in court | loc: bíró
  EN TS: The judge is using her gavel.
  hu TS: A bíró a kalapácsát használja.
  EN FS: The judge is using her phone.
  hu FS: A bíró a telefonját használja.
  EN TP: a judge with a gavel
  hu TP: bíró kalapáccsal
  EN FP: a judge in a wig
  hu FP: parókás bíró
5028 | difficult (adjective): not easy, needing a lot of effort to do | loc: nehéz
  EN TS: Difficult case? Just a few books.
  hu TS: Nehéz ügy? Csak pár könyv.
  EN FS: Difficult case? Just a few pens.
  hu FS: Nehéz ügy? Csak pár toll.
  EN TP: a difficult court case
  hu TP: nehéz bírósági ügy
  EN FP: a difficult exam
  hu FP: nehéz vizsga
5029 | gesture (noun): a motion of the hands or body to show a feeling | loc: gesztus
  EN TS: His gesture says: I won!
  hu TS: A srác gesztusa azt mondja: nyertem!
  EN FS: Her gesture says: I won!
  hu FS: A lány gesztusa azt mondja: nyertem!
  EN TP: a winning fist gesture
  hu TP: győztes ökölgesztus
  EN FP: a rude hand gesture
  hu FP: durva kézgesztus
5030 | costume (noun): special clothes worn for a show or festival | loc: jelmez
  EN TS: Her costume has every colour!
  hu TS: A jelmezén minden szín ott van!
  EN FS: Her hat has every colour!
  hu FS: A kalapján minden szín ott van!
  EN TP: a rainbow feather costume
  hu TP: szivárványos tolljelmez
  EN FP: a costume for Halloween
  hu FP: halloweeni jelmez
5031 | leader (noun): a person who guides others | loc: vezető
  EN TS: The leader is pointing ahead.
  hu TS: A vezető előre mutat.
  EN FS: The leader is sitting down.
  hu FS: A vezető leül.
  EN TP: a leader on a mountain
  hu TP: vezető egy hegyen
  EN FP: a leader on a beach
  hu FP: vezető egy tengerparton
5032 | ahead (adverb): in front of the others | loc: elöl
  EN TS: She is leading the team ahead.
  hu TS: Elöl vezeti a csapatot.
  EN FS: She is leading the team back.
  hu FS: Visszafelé vezeti a csapatot.
  EN TP: walking ahead of the group
  hu TP: elöl halad a csoport előtt
  EN FP: planning ahead for the trip
  hu FP: előre tervez az útra
5033 | drum (noun): a musical instrument you hit to make a beat | loc: dob
  EN TS: The neighbours can hear these drums.
  hu TS: A szomszédok hallják ezeket a dobokat.
  EN FS: The neighbours can hear these horns.
  hu FS: A szomszédok hallják ezeket a kürtöket.
  EN TP: beating the drums
  hu TP: veri a dobokat
  EN FP: a drum solo
  hu FP: dobszóló
5034 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: kiönt
  EN TS: Everything spills in her home!
  hu TS: Otthon mindent kiönt!
  EN FS: Everything burns in her home!
  hu FS: Otthon mindent odaéget!
  EN TP: milk spilling on the table
  hu TP: kiöntött tej az asztalon
  EN FP: spilling coffee on a laptop
  hu FP: kávét önt ki a laptopra
5035 | talent (noun): natural abilities or qualities you have | loc: tehetség
  EN TS: That juggler has talent!
  hu TS: Ennek a zsonglőrnek van tehetsége!
  EN FS: That singer has talent!
  hu FS: Ennek az énekesnek van tehetsége!
  EN TP: a talent for juggling
  hu TP: tehetség a zsonglőrködéshez
  EN FP: a talent show
  hu FP: tehetségkutató
5036 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: tanulni
  EN TS: She teaches, he learns. Slowly.
  hu TS: A lány tanít, a srác tanul. Lassan.
  EN FS: He teaches, she learns. Slowly.
  hu FS: A srác tanít, a lány tanul. Lassan.
  EN TP: learning to juggle
  hu TP: zsonglőrködni tanul
  EN FP: learning to dance
  hu FP: táncolni tanul
5037 | sidewalk (noun): the paved path beside a road where people walk | loc: járda
  EN TS: She is on a Paris sidewalk.
  hu TS: Egy párizsi járdán van.
  EN FS: She is on a Paris bridge.
  hu FS: Egy párizsi hídon van.
  EN TP: a wide paved sidewalk
  hu TP: széles, kövezett járda
  EN FP: a sidewalk cafe table
  hu FP: járdai kávézóasztal
5038 | pace (noun): how fast you are walking or running | loc: tempó
  EN TS: A steady pace up the Great Wall.
  hu TS: Egyenletes tempó felfelé a kínai nagy falon.
  EN FS: A steady pace down the Great Wall.
  hu FS: Egyenletes tempó lefelé a kínai nagy falon.
  EN TP: a steady running pace
  hu TP: egyenletes futótempó
  EN FP: a slow walking pace
  hu FP: lassú sétatempó
5039 | cage (noun): a box of metal bars that shuts an animal in | loc: kalitka
  EN TS: He is opening the cages.
  hu TS: Kinyitja a kalitkákat.
  EN FS: He is closing the cages.
  hu FS: Becsukja a kalitkákat.
  EN TP: opening the bird cages
  hu TP: madárkalitkák kinyitása
  EN FP: cleaning the bird cages
  hu FP: madárkalitkák takarítása
5040 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: fotel
  EN TS: An armchair? On a bike? Sure.
  hu TS: Fotel? Biciklin? Persze.
  EN FS: A sofa? On a bike? Sure.
  hu FS: Kanapé? Biciklin? Persze.
  EN TP: a yellow velvet armchair
  hu TP: sárga bársonyfotel
  EN FP: an armchair in a car
  hu FP: fotel egy autóban
5041 | flash (noun): a sudden burst of bright light | loc: villanás
  EN TS: A white flash lights the roof.
  hu TS: Fehér villanás világítja meg a tetőt.
  EN FS: A green flash lights the roof.
  hu FS: Zöld villanás világítja meg a tetőt.
  EN TP: a blinding white flash
  hu TP: vakító fehér villanás
  EN FP: a camera flash indoors
  hu FP: vakuvillanás egy szobában
5042 | painful (adjective): causing pain in your body or mind | loc: fájdalmas
  EN TS: Leg day was painful!
  hu TS: A lábnap fájdalmas volt!
  EN FS: Arm day was painful!
  hu FS: A karnap fájdalmas volt!
  EN TP: painful stiff legs
  hu TP: fájdalmasan merev lábak
  EN FP: a painful sunburn
  hu FP: fájdalmas leégés
5043 | silent (adjective): with no sound at all | loc: csendes
  EN TS: The lion is not silent.
  hu TS: Az oroszlán nem csendes.
  EN FS: The lion is not alone.
  hu FS: Az oroszlán nem egyedül van.
  EN TP: not a silent lion
  hu TP: nem túl csendes oroszlán
  EN FP: a silent lion
  hu FP: csendes oroszlán
5044 | hear (verb): to notice a sound with your ears | loc: hallani | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He can hear through the door.
  hu TS: Az ajtón keresztül is hall.
  EN FS: He can hear through the wall.
  hu FS: A falon keresztül is hall.
  EN TP: hearing through a door
  hu TP: hallani az ajtón át
  EN FP: hearing a doorbell ring
  hu FP: hallani a csengőt
5045 | sound (noun): the effect you hear from something | loc: hang
  EN TS: The speakers make a big sound!
  hu TS: A hangszórók nagy hangot adnak!
  EN FS: The drums make a big sound!
  hu FS: A dobok nagy hangot adnak!
  EN TP: sound from a boombox
  hu TP: hang egy magnóból
  EN FP: sound from a car radio
  hu FP: hang az autórádióból
5046 | television (noun): broadcasting moving pictures to a screen | loc: televízió
  EN TS: The television made him jump!
  hu TS: A televíziótól összerezzent!
  EN FS: The television made him cry!
  hu FS: A televíziótól elsírta magát!
  EN TP: watching television
  hu TP: televíziót néz
  EN FP: fixing the television
  hu FP: televíziót javít
5047 | living room (noun): the room in a home where people sit and relax | loc: nappali
  EN TS: Nobody is leaving the living room tonight.
  hu TS: Ma este senki nem hagyja el a nappalit.
  EN FS: Nobody is leaving the kitchen tonight.
  hu FS: Ma este senki nem hagyja el a konyhát.
  EN TP: a cosy living room
  hu TP: hangulatos nappali
  EN FP: cleaning the living room
  hu FP: a nappali takarítása
5048 | shut (adjective): closed, not open | loc: zárt
  EN TS: Big padlock, doors still shut.
  hu TS: Nagy lakat, az ajtók még mindig zártak.
  EN FS: Big padlock, doors wide open.
  hu FS: Nagy lakat, az ajtók tárva-nyitva.
  EN TP: doors firmly shut
  hu TP: szorosan zárt ajtók
  EN FP: eyes shut tight
  hu FP: szorosan zárt szemek
5049 | close (verb): to move something so an opening is blocked | loc: becsukni
  EN TS: He is closing the front door.
  hu TS: Becsukja a bejárati ajtót.
  EN FS: He is closing the garage door.
  hu FS: Becsukja a garázsajtót.
  EN TP: closing a front door
  hu TP: bejárati ajtó becsukása
  EN FP: closing a shop
  hu FP: bolt bezárása
5050 | lose (verb): to fail to win | loc: veszíteni
  EN TS: He lost, and the guests left.
  hu TS: Veszített, és a vendégek elmentek.
  EN FS: He won, and the guests left.
  hu FS: Nyert, és a vendégek elmentek.
  EN TP: losing an election
  hu TP: választást veszít
  EN FP: losing his car keys
  hu FP: elveszíti az autókulcsát
5051 | lose (verb): to put something where you cannot find it | loc: elveszíteni
  EN TS: She lost it. Passport, maybe?
  hu TS: Elveszített valamit. Talán az útlevelét?
  EN FS: She found it. Passport, maybe?
  hu FS: Megtalált valamit. Talán az útlevelét?
  EN TP: losing something important
  hu TP: valami fontos elveszítése
  EN FP: losing a football match
  hu FP: focimeccs elveszítése
5052 | light (adjective): having little physical weight, not heavy | loc: könnyű
  EN TS: The bags are not light.
  hu TS: A táskák nem könnyűek.
  EN FS: The chairs are not light.
  hu FS: A székek nem könnyűek.
  EN TP: suitcases that are not light
  hu TP: nem könnyű bőröndök
  EN FP: light hand luggage
  hu FP: könnyű kézipoggyász
5053 | label (noun): a short description that identifies something | loc: címke
  EN TS: The label displays her photo.
  hu TS: A címkén az ő fotója van.
  EN FS: The label displays her dog.
  hu FS: A címkén a kutyája van.
  EN TP: a label with her photo
  hu TP: címke a fotójával
  EN FP: a label on a jar
  hu FP: címke egy befőttesüvegen
5054 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: felemelni
  EN TS: Bro is lifting half the house.
  hu TS: A tesó fél házat felemel.
  EN FS: Bro is lifting half the tent.
  hu FS: A tesó fél sátrat felemel.
  EN TP: lifting cases into a van
  hu TP: dobozok felemelése egy furgonba
  EN FP: lifting weights in a gym
  hu FP: súlyemelés edzőteremben
5055 | organ (noun): a body part in an animal with its own function | loc: szerv
  EN TS: Two pink organs: the lungs.
  hu TS: Két rózsaszín szerv: a tüdő.
  EN FS: Two pink organs: the kidneys.
  hu FS: Két rózsaszín szerv: a vesék.
  EN TP: a pair of breathing organs
  hu TP: egy pár légzőszerv
  EN FP: a church organ playing
  hu FP: játszó templomi orgona
5056 | maid (noun): a woman whose job is cleaning hotel rooms | loc: szobalány
  EN TS: The maid made a towel swan.
  hu TS: A szobalány törölközőhattyút hajtogatott.
  EN FS: The maid made a towel dog.
  hu FS: A szobalány törölközőkutyát hajtogatott.
  EN TP: a maid folding towels
  hu TP: törölközőt hajtogató szobalány
  EN FP: a maid in a castle
  hu FP: szobalány egy kastélyban
5057 | mail (noun): letters and packages sent by post | loc: postai küldemény
  EN TS: Her mail is flying everywhere!
  hu TS: Mindenfelé repülnek a postai küldeményei!
  EN FS: Her cash is flying everywhere!
  hu FS: Mindenfelé repül a készpénze!
  EN TP: mail from the mailbox
  hu TP: postai küldemény a postaládából
  EN FP: mail on a computer
  hu FP: levél a számítógépen
5058 | postman (noun): a person whose job is to bring letters to houses | loc: postás
  EN TS: The boy loves the postman now.
  hu TS: A kisfiú most már imádja a postást.
  EN FS: The boy loves the teacher now.
  hu FS: A kisfiú most már imádja a tanárt.
  EN TP: a postman with letters
  hu TP: postás levelekkel
  EN FP: a postman with a dog
  hu FP: postás kutyával
5059 | letter (noun): a written message you send to a person | loc: levél
  EN TS: He got a lot of letters!
  hu TS: Rengeteg levelet kapott!
  EN FS: He got a lot of flowers!
  hu FS: Rengeteg virágot kapott!
  EN TP: a stack of letters
  hu TP: egy köteg levél
  EN FP: a letter from school
  hu FP: levél az iskolából
5060 | male (noun): a person of the sex that cannot have babies | loc: férfi
  EN TS: Only males are in this video.
  hu TS: Ebben a videóban csak férfiak vannak.
  EN FS: Only girls are in this video.
  hu FS: Ebben a videóban csak lányok vannak.
  EN TP: males of every age
  hu TP: férfiak minden korosztályból
  EN FP: males in a football team
  hu FP: férfiak egy focicsapatban
5061 | aquarium (noun): a glass tank of water where fish are kept | loc: akvárium
  EN TS: Oh wow, what an aquarium!
  hu TS: Hűha, micsoda akvárium!
  EN FS: Oh wow, what a volcano!
  hu FS: Hűha, micsoda vulkán!
  EN TP: a huge aquarium
  hu TP: hatalmas akvárium
  EN FP: a huge swimming pool
  hu FP: hatalmas medence
5062 | boss (noun): a person who is in control of workers | loc: főnök
  EN TS: The boss is drawing a graph.
  hu TS: A főnök grafikont rajzol.
  EN FS: The boss is drawing a cat.
  hu FS: A főnök macskát rajzol.
  EN TP: a boss giving instructions
  hu TP: utasításokat adó főnök
  EN FP: a boss taking a break
  hu FP: szünetet tartó főnök
5063 | column (noun): a line of people following one after another | loc: menetoszlop
  EN TS: The column is moving in order.
  hu TS: A menetoszlop rendben halad.
  EN FS: The crowd is moving in order.
  hu FS: A tömeg rendben halad.
  EN TP: a column of marching ranks
  hu TP: menetelő sorok menetoszlopa
  EN FP: a column in a newspaper
  hu FP: rovat egy újságban
5064 | trumpet (noun): a brass instrument you blow into | loc: trombita
  EN TS: A hundred trumpets. My poor ears!
  hu TS: Száz trombita. Szegény fülem!
  EN FS: A hundred violins. My poor ears!
  hu FS: Száz hegedű. Szegény fülem!
  EN TP: marching with trumpets
  hu TP: menetelés trombitákkal
  EN FP: a jazz club trumpet
  hu FP: trombita egy jazzklubban
5065 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: sorok közti folyosó | translator note: loc "sorok közti folyosó" too clunky; used folyosó
  EN TS: A long aisle of spices.
  hu TS: Hosszú folyosó csupa fűszerrel.
  EN FS: A long aisle of shoes.
  hu FS: Hosszú folyosó csupa cipővel.
  EN TP: an aisle of spice stalls
  hu TP: fűszerárusok közti folyosó
  EN FP: the aisle of a plane
  hu FP: folyosó a repülőn
5066 | sample (noun): a small part that shows what the whole is like | loc: minta
  EN TS: Just one olive, as a sample.
  hu TS: Csak egy olajbogyó, mintának.
  EN FS: Just one date, as a sample.
  hu FS: Csak egy datolya, mintának.
  EN TP: an olive as a sample
  hu TP: olajbogyó mintaként
  EN FP: a sample of spices
  hu FP: fűszerminta
5067 | marriage (noun): the state of being a married couple | loc: házasság
  EN TS: Marriage starts with a kiss!
  hu TS: A házasság csókkal kezdődik!
  EN FS: Marriage starts with a fight!
  hu FS: A házasság veszekedéssel kezdődik!
  EN TP: a marriage with confetti
  hu TP: házasság konfettivel
  EN FP: a marriage in a church
  hu FP: házasság a templomban
5068 | bride (noun): the woman getting married that day | loc: menyasszony
  EN TS: The bride is giving a ring.
  hu TS: A menyasszony gyűrűt ad át.
  EN FS: The bride is giving a speech.
  hu FS: A menyasszony beszédet mond.
  EN TP: a bride on the beach
  hu TP: menyasszony a tengerparton
  EN FP: a bride in a church
  hu FP: menyasszony a templomban
5069 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: élvezni
  EN TS: Oh wow! He is enjoying the massage.
  hu TS: Hűha! Élvezi a masszázst.
  EN FS: Oh wow! He is enjoying the coffee.
  hu FS: Hűha! Élvezi a kávét.
  EN TP: to enjoy a neck massage
  hu TP: élvezni egy nyakmasszázst
  EN FP: to enjoy a foot massage
  hu FP: élvezni egy lábmasszázst
5070 | mattress (noun): the thick soft part of a bed you lie on | loc: matrac
  EN TS: She's testing every mattress.
  hu TS: Minden matracot kipróbál.
  EN FS: She's testing every pillow.
  hu FS: Minden párnát kipróbál.
  EN TP: lying back on a mattress
  hu TP: hanyatt fekve egy matracon
  EN FP: carrying a mattress
  hu FP: matracot cipel
5071 | service (verb): to make a machine fit to use again | loc: szervizelni
  EN TS: He is servicing the vehicle.
  hu TS: Szervizeli a járművet.
  EN FS: He is servicing the bicycle.
  hu FS: Szervizeli a biciklit.
  EN TP: servicing a silver car
  hu TP: ezüst autó szervizelése
  EN FP: servicing a washing machine
  hu FP: mosógép szervizelése
5072 | liquid (noun): a substance that is liquid, not solid or gas | loc: folyadék
  EN TS: The brown liquid is very viscous.
  hu TS: A barna folyadék nagyon viszkózus.
  EN FS: The green liquid is very viscous.
  hu FS: A zöld folyadék nagyon viszkózus.
  EN TP: pouring a brown liquid
  hu TP: barna folyadékot önt
  EN FP: pouring a clear liquid
  hu FP: átlátszó folyadékot önt
5073 | medicine (noun): something you take that treats an illness | loc: gyógyszer
  EN TS: This medicine tastes awful!
  hu TS: Ez a gyógyszer borzalmas ízű!
  EN FS: This medicine tastes great!
  hu FS: Ez a gyógyszer isteni ízű!
  EN TP: a spoon of brown medicine
  hu TP: egy kanál barna gyógyszer
  EN FP: a medicine for a dog
  hu FP: gyógyszer kutyának
5074 | introduce (verb): to make people come to know each other | loc: bemutatni | translator note: TS uses reflexive bemutatkozik (introduce oneself)
  EN TS: Everyone is introducing themselves to her.
  hu TS: Mindenki bemutatkozik a lánynak.
  EN FS: Everyone is introducing themselves to him.
  hu FS: Mindenki bemutatkozik a srácnak.
  EN TP: introducing a new colleague
  hu TP: új kolléga bemutatása
  EN FP: introducing a new product
  hu FP: új termék bemutatása
5075 | sticky (adjective): having sticky properties, like glue | loc: ragacsos
  EN TS: Sticky hands, empty cone. "Great."
  hu TS: Ragacsos kéz, üres tölcsér. „Szuper.”
  EN FS: Sticky hands, full cone. "Great."
  hu FS: Ragacsos kéz, teli tölcsér. „Szuper.”
  EN TP: sticky hands from ice cream
  hu TP: fagyitól ragacsos kéz
  EN FP: sticky tape on a box
  hu FP: ragacsos szalag egy dobozon
5076 | member (noun): one of the persons who joined a group | loc: tag
  EN TS: She is a new club member.
  hu TS: Ő egy új klubtag.
  EN FS: She is a new band member.
  hu FS: Ő egy új zenekari tag.
  EN TP: a new club member
  hu TP: új klubtag
  EN FP: a member of a band
  hu FP: egy zenekar tagja
5077 | recall (verb): to bring knowledge back from your memory | loc: felidézni
  EN TS: He recalled every card, easy.
  hu TS: A srác minden kártyát felidézett, könnyedén.
  EN FS: She recalled every card, easy.
  hu FS: A csaj minden kártyát felidézett, könnyedén.
  EN TP: recalling answers on cards
  hu TP: válaszok felidézése kártyákról
  EN FP: recalling a broken car
  hu FP: hibás autók visszahívása
5078 | pork (noun): meat that comes from a pig | loc: sertéshús
  EN TS: He is making pork tacos.
  hu TS: Sertéshúsos tacót készít.
  EN FS: He is making fish tacos.
  hu FS: Halas tacót készít.
  EN TP: slicing roasted pork
  hu TP: sült sertéshús szeletelése
  EN FP: pork chops in a pan
  hu FP: sertésszelet serpenyőben
5079 | pyramid (noun): a huge ancient building with triangle sides | loc: piramis
  EN TS: Taco first, pyramid second.
  hu TS: Előbb taco, aztán piramis.
  EN FS: Taco first, beach second.
  hu FS: Előbb taco, aztán strand.
  EN TP: a pyramid in the jungle
  hu TP: piramis a dzsungelben
  EN FP: a pyramid in the desert
  hu FP: piramis a sivatagban
5080 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: sárga
  EN TS: The yellow dress looks great.
  hu TS: Nagyon jól áll a sárga ruha.
  EN FS: The yellow coat looks great.
  hu FS: Nagyon jól áll a sárga kabát.
  EN TP: a bright yellow sundress
  hu TP: élénksárga nyári ruha
  EN FP: a bright yellow raincoat
  hu FP: élénksárga esőkabát
5081 | purple (adjective): the color between red and blue | loc: lila
  EN TS: Purple is her colour.
  hu TS: A lila az ő színe.
  EN FS: Green is her colour.
  hu FS: A zöld az ő színe.
  EN TP: a fitted purple dress
  hu TP: testhezálló lila ruha
  EN FP: a purple silk scarf
  hu FP: lila selyemsál
5082 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: frizura
  EN TS: Two buns? Great hairstyle.
  hu TS: Két konty? Remek frizura.
  EN FS: Two braids? Great hairstyle.
  hu FS: Két copf? Remek frizura.
  EN TP: a hairstyle with two buns
  hu TP: kétkontyos frizura
  EN FP: a hairstyle with a fringe
  hu FP: frufrus frizura
5083 | berry (noun): small soft fruits that you can eat | loc: bogyó
  EN TS: They are adding berries.
  hu TS: Bogyókat adnak hozzá.
  EN FS: They are adding nuts.
  hu FS: Diót adnak hozzá.
  EN TP: red berries in the batter
  hu TP: piros bogyók a tésztában
  EN FP: picking berries in a forest
  hu FP: bogyószedés az erdőben
5084 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: zöld
  EN TS: The green gown is stunning!
  hu TS: Lenyűgöző a zöld estélyi!
  EN FS: The red gown is stunning!
  hu FS: Lenyűgöző a piros estélyi!
  EN TP: a long green gown
  hu TP: hosszú zöld estélyi
  EN FP: a green evening bag
  hu FP: zöld estélyi táska
5085 | statue (noun): a figure of a person or creature made of stone | loc: szobor
  EN TS: She is posing like the statue!
  hu TS: Úgy pózol, mint a szobor!
  EN FS: She is posing like the guard!
  hu FS: Úgy pózol, mint az őr!
  EN TP: a selfie with a statue
  hu TP: szelfi egy szoborral
  EN FP: a selfie with a horse
  hu FP: szelfi egy lóval
5086 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: fényes
  EN TS: The floor is so shiny!
  hu TS: A padló olyan fényes!
  EN FS: The floor is so dusty!
  hu FS: A padló olyan poros!
  EN TP: a shiny stone floor
  hu TP: fényes kőpadló
  EN FP: a shiny new phone
  hu FP: fényes új telefon
5087 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: piszkos
  EN TS: Paws made the floor dirty.
  hu TS: A mancsok piszkossá tették a padlót.
  EN FS: Paws made the wall dirty.
  hu FS: A mancsok piszkossá tették a falat.
  EN TP: a dirty tiled floor
  hu TP: piszkos csempés padló
  EN FP: dirty dishes in a sink
  hu FP: piszkos edények a mosogatóban
5088 | awake (adjective): not in a state of sleep | loc: ébren
  EN TS: The boy is awake and yawning.
  hu TS: A kisfiú ébren van és ásít.
  EN FS: The boy is awake and eating.
  hu FS: A kisfiú ébren van és eszik.
  EN TP: awake at sunrise
  hu TP: ébren napkeltekor
  EN FP: awake at midnight
  hu FP: ébren éjfélkor
5089 | mother (noun): a woman who has given birth to a child | loc: anya
  EN TS: This mother does it all.
  hu TS: Ez az anya mindent megcsinál.
  EN FS: This father does it all.
  hu FS: Ez az apa mindent megcsinál.
  EN TP: a mother flipping pancakes
  hu TP: palacsintát forgató anya
  EN FP: a mother buying pancakes
  hu FP: palacsintát vásárló anya
5090 | nursery (noun): a room in a home for a baby | loc: gyerekszoba
  EN TS: A cosy nursery full of toys.
  hu TS: Hangulatos gyerekszoba tele játékkal.
  EN FS: A cosy kitchen full of toys.
  hu FS: Hangulatos konyha tele játékkal.
  EN TP: a nursery with a cot
  hu TP: kiságyas gyerekszoba
  EN FP: a plant nursery
  hu FP: faiskola
5091 | motorbike (noun): a two-wheeled motor vehicle you ride | loc: motor
  EN TS: The small motorbike is green.
  hu TS: A kis motor zöld.
  EN FS: The small motorbike is red.
  hu FS: A kis motor piros.
  EN TP: a green motorbike in town
  hu TP: zöld motor a városban
  EN FP: a green motorbike for sale
  hu FP: eladó zöld motor
5092 | helper (noun): a person who helps someone | loc: segítő
  EN TS: Our helper moves boxes like a pro.
  hu TS: A segítőnk profin pakolja a dobozokat.
  EN FS: Our helper moves plants like a pro.
  hu FS: A segítőnk profin pakolja a növényeket.
  EN TP: a helper with a box
  hu TP: segítő egy dobozzal
  EN FP: a helper with a lamp
  hu FP: segítő egy lámpával
5093 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: benőtt
  EN TS: The lawn was a bit overgrown.
  hu TS: Kicsit benőtt volt a pázsit.
  EN FS: The pool was a bit overgrown.
  hu FS: Kicsit benőtt volt a medence.
  EN TP: mowing overgrown grass
  hu TP: benőtt fű lenyírása
  EN FP: an overgrown hedge
  hu FP: benőtt sövény
5094 | skinny (adjective): being very thin | loc: sovány
  EN TS: He is flexing his skinny arm.
  hu TS: Megfeszíti a sovány karját.
  EN FS: He is flexing his skinny leg.
  hu FS: Megfeszíti a sovány lábát.
  EN TP: flexing a skinny arm
  hu TP: sovány kar megfeszítése
  EN FP: wearing skinny jeans
  hu FP: szűk farmer viselése
5095 | awe (noun): a huge feeling of wonder at something | loc: ámulat
  EN TS: He is staring up in awe!
  hu TS: Ámulattal bámul felfelé!
  EN FS: He is staring down in awe!
  hu FS: Ámulattal bámul lefelé!
  EN TP: awe at a giant skeleton
  hu TP: ámulat egy óriás csontváz előtt
  EN FP: awe at a tiny coin
  hu FP: ámulat egy apró érme előtt
5096 | ground (noun): the solid surface of the earth you stand on | loc: föld
  EN TS: Mushrooms grow in the ground.
  hu TS: A gomba a földben nő.
  EN FS: Mushrooms grow in the water.
  hu FS: A gomba a vízben nő.
  EN TP: a mushroom on the ground
  hu TP: gomba a földön
  EN FP: a mushroom on a pizza
  hu FP: gomba a pizzán
5097 | music (noun): an art form of instrumental or vocal tones | loc: zene
  EN TS: His music stopped the street.
  hu TS: A zenéje megállította az utcát.
  EN FS: His music emptied the street.
  hu FS: A zenéje kiürítette az utcát.
  EN TP: street music
  hu TP: utcai zene
  EN FP: a music shop
  hu FP: zenebolt
5098 | national (adjective): belonging to one nation or country | loc: nemzeti
  EN TS: He loves his national team.
  hu TS: A srác imádja a nemzeti válogatottat.
  EN FS: She loves her national team.
  hu FS: A lány imádja a nemzeti válogatottat.
  EN TP: national colours on a face
  hu TP: nemzeti színek egy arcon
  EN FP: a national holiday
  hu FP: nemzeti ünnep
5099 | photo (noun): a print of a person or scene | loc: fénykép
  EN TS: Everyone is adding a photo!
  hu TS: Mindenki hozzáad egy fényképet!
  EN FS: Everyone is adding a stamp!
  hu FS: Mindenki hozzáad egy bélyeget!
  EN TP: photos on a world map
  hu TP: fényképek egy világtérképen
  EN FP: a photo album
  hu FP: fényképalbum
5100 | stick (verb): to put or fix something in place | loc: rögzíteni
  EN TS: They are sticking photos on a map.
  hu TS: Fotókat rögzítenek egy térképen.
  EN FS: They are sticking photos on a door.
  hu FS: Fotókat rögzítenek egy ajtón.
  EN TP: sticking photos on a map
  hu TP: fotók rögzítése térképre
  EN FP: sticking maps on the wall
  hu FP: térképek rögzítése a falra
5101 | nausea (noun): the sick feeling that you may vomit | loc: hányinger
  EN TS: Nausea is winning this trip.
  hu TS: Ezen az úton a hányinger nyer.
  EN FS: Nausea is winning this flight.
  hu FS: Ezen a repülőúton a hányinger nyer.
  EN TP: nausea on a ferry
  hu TP: hányinger a kompon
  EN FP: nausea in a car
  hu FP: hányinger az autóban
5102 | alley (noun): a very narrow street between buildings | loc: sikátor
  EN TS: This alley is super narrow!
  hu TS: Ez a sikátor szuper szűk!
  EN FS: This alley is super wide!
  hu FS: Ez a sikátor szuper széles!
  EN TP: a narrow medina alley
  hu TP: szűk medinai sikátor
  EN FP: an alley full of cats
  hu FP: macskákkal teli sikátor
5103 | neck (noun): the part that connects the head to the body | loc: nyak
  EN TS: A giraffe's neck is over her!
  hu TS: Egy zsiráf nyaka hajol fölé!
  EN FS: A horse's neck is over her!
  hu FS: Egy ló nyaka hajol fölé!
  EN TP: a giraffe's long neck
  hu TP: zsiráf hosszú nyaka
  EN FP: a snake around her neck
  hu FP: kígyó a nyaka körül
5104 | talk (noun): a conversation where people exchange ideas | loc: beszélgetés
  EN TS: Their talk is friendly.
  hu TS: Barátságos a beszélgetésük.
  EN FS: Their talk is angry.
  hu FS: Dühös a beszélgetésük.
  EN TP: a talk over the fence
  hu TP: beszélgetés a kerítés fölött
  EN FP: a talk at a conference
  hu FP: beszélgetés egy konferencián
5105 | ditch (noun): a long narrow channel dug into the earth | loc: árok
  EN TS: A ditch full of ducks.
  hu TS: Kacsákkal teli árok.
  EN FS: A ditch full of boats.
  hu FS: Csónakokkal teli árok.
  EN TP: a straight water ditch
  hu TP: egyenes vizesárok
  EN FP: a ditch by a motorway
  hu FP: árok az autópálya mellett
5106 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: szélmalom
  EN TS: Windmill, tulips, stroopwafel: done.
  hu TS: Szélmalom, tulipán, stroopwafel: pipa.
  EN FS: Windmill, tulips, pizza slice: done.
  hu FS: Szélmalom, tulipán, pizzaszelet: pipa.
  EN TP: a turning windmill
  hu TP: forgó szélmalom
  EN FP: a windmill on a beach
  hu FP: szélmalom a tengerparton
5107 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: karjában ringat
  EN TS: Both are cradling the baby.
  hu TS: Mindketten a karjukban ringatják a babát.
  EN FS: Both are washing the baby.
  hu FS: Mindketten fürdetik a babát.
  EN TP: to cradle a newborn
  hu TP: újszülöttet karjában ringat
  EN FP: to cradle a teacup
  hu FP: teáscsészét dédelget
5108 | village (noun): a place where people live, smaller than a town | loc: falu
  EN TS: The village is on the water.
  hu TS: A falu a vízen áll.
  EN FS: The village is on the hill.
  hu FS: A falu a dombon áll.
  EN TP: a village on stilts
  hu TP: cölöpökön álló falu
  EN FP: a village in the snow
  hu FP: hóval borított falu
5109 | sweet (adjective): having the taste of sugar | loc: édes
  EN TS: A dozen sweet cupcakes, and she is eating alone.
  hu TS: Egy tucat édes cupcake, és egyedül eszik.
  EN FS: A dozen sweet cookies, and she is eating alone.
  hu FS: Egy tucat édes keksz, és egyedül eszik.
  EN TP: a tray of sweet cupcakes
  hu TP: egy tálca édes cupcake
  EN FP: a sweet cup of tea
  hu FP: egy csésze édes tea
5110 | quiet (adjective): with almost no activity going on | loc: csendes
  EN TS: The park is very quiet.
  hu TS: A park nagyon csendes.
  EN FS: The beach is very quiet.
  hu FS: A strand nagyon csendes.
  EN TP: a quiet misty park
  hu TP: csendes, ködös park
  EN FP: a quiet misty beach
  hu FP: csendes, ködös strand
5111 | nurse (verb): to care for someone who is ill | loc: ápolni
  EN TS: She is nursing a sick child.
  hu TS: Egy beteg gyereket ápol.
  EN FS: She is nursing a sick puppy.
  hu FS: Egy beteg kiskutyát ápol.
  EN TP: nursing a sick child
  hu TP: beteg gyerek ápolása
  EN FP: nursing a glass of water
  hu FP: egy pohár víz kortyolgatása
5112 | grain (noun): a small particle of a substance | loc: szemcse
  EN TS: Grains are flying in the air.
  hu TS: Szemcsék repülnek a levegőben.
  EN FS: Grains are flying into a cup.
  hu FS: Szemcsék repülnek egy csészébe.
  EN TP: falling grains of rice
  hu TP: hulló rizsszemcsék
  EN FP: a grain of sand
  hu FP: egy homokszem
5113 | advice (noun): an idea about the best action to take | loc: tanács
  EN TS: Good advice: eat more fish.
  hu TS: Jó tanács: egyél több halat.
  EN FS: Good advice: eat more cake.
  hu FS: Jó tanács: egyél több tortát.
  EN TP: advice about healthy food
  hu TP: tanács az egészséges ételről
  EN FP: advice about money
  hu FP: pénzügyi tanács
5114 | flamingo (noun): a tall pink water bird with a bent beak | loc: flamingó
  EN TS: The flamingos are flying away.
  hu TS: A flamingók elrepülnek.
  EN FS: The swans are flying away.
  hu FS: A hattyúk elrepülnek.
  EN TP: a flock of flamingos
  hu TP: flamingócsapat
  EN FP: a flamingo in a zoo
  hu FP: flamingó az állatkertben
5115 | study (verb): to look at something in detail | loc: tanulmányozni
  EN TS: She is studying an insect.
  hu TS: Egy rovart tanulmányoz.
  EN FS: She is studying a flower.
  hu FS: Egy virágot tanulmányoz.
  EN TP: studying a small insect
  hu TP: kis rovar tanulmányozása
  EN FP: studying for an exam
  hu FP: tanulás egy vizsgára
5116 | to open (verb): to make something become open | loc: kinyitni
  EN TS: He is opening all the windows!
  hu TS: Kinyitja az összes ablakot!
  EN FS: He is closing all the windows!
  hu FS: Becsukja az összes ablakot!
  EN TP: to open the windows
  hu TP: kinyitni az ablakokat
  EN FP: to open a present
  hu FP: kinyitni egy ajándékot
5117 | bookstore (noun): a shop where books are sold | loc: könyvesbolt
  EN TS: He loves this bookstore!
  hu TS: Imádja ezt a könyvesboltot!
  EN FS: He hates this bookstore!
  hu FS: Utálja ezt a könyvesboltot!
  EN TP: a packed old bookstore
  hu TP: zsúfolt régi könyvesbolt
  EN FP: a bookstore closing down
  hu FP: bezáró könyvesbolt
5118 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: napfény
  EN TS: Sunlight is pouring over him. What a morning!
  hu TS: Napfény ömlik rá. Micsoda reggel!
  EN FS: Rain is pouring over him. What a morning!
  hu FS: Eső ömlik rá. Micsoda reggel!
  EN TP: sunlight through a window
  hu TP: napfény az ablakon át
  EN FP: sunlight through the trees
  hu FP: napfény a fák között
5119 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: bejárat
  EN TS: The entrance has wooden gates.
  hu TS: A bejáratnál fakapuk vannak.
  EN FS: The entrance has glass gates.
  hu FS: A bejáratnál üvegkapuk vannak.
  EN TP: the park entrance
  hu TP: a park bejárata
  EN FP: the museum entrance
  hu FP: a múzeum bejárata
5120 | surgeon (noun): a doctor who does surgery | loc: sebész
  EN TS: All done! The surgeons are happy.
  hu TS: Kész! A sebészek boldogok.
  EN FS: All done! The bakers are happy.
  hu FS: Kész! A pékek boldogok.
  EN TP: surgeons around a patient
  hu TP: sebészek egy beteg körül
  EN FP: surgeons in a waiting room
  hu FP: sebészek egy váróteremben
5121 | remove (verb): to take something off or out by lifting it | loc: kivenni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is removing the muffins.
  hu TS: Kiveszi a muffinokat.
  EN FS: She is removing the cookies.
  hu FS: Kiveszi a kekszeket.
  EN TP: removing a tray of muffins
  hu TP: muffinos tálca kivétele
  EN FP: removing the oven door
  hu FP: a sütőajtó leszerelése
5122 | achieve (verb): to gain something by real effort | loc: elér
  EN TS: They all achieved their goals.
  hu TS: Mindannyian elérték a céljukat.
  EN FS: They all missed their goals.
  hu FS: Mindannyian elhibázták a céljukat.
  EN TP: achieving a hard goal
  hu TP: nehéz cél elérése
  EN FP: achieving good grades
  hu FP: jó jegyek elérése
5123 | flood (verb): to fill something too quickly and spill over | loc: elárasztani
  EN TS: Coffee, sink and bath are all flooding!
  hu TS: A kávé, a mosogató és a kád mindent eláraszt!
  EN FS: Coffee, sink and oven are all flooding!
  hu FS: A kávé, a mosogató és a sütő mindent eláraszt!
  EN TP: a flooding bathtub
  hu TP: fürdőszobát elárasztó kád
  EN FP: a flooded road after rain
  hu FP: eső után elárasztott út
5124 | marathon (noun): a running race of about 42 kilometres | loc: maraton
  EN TS: Marathon in the old town.
  hu TS: Maraton az óvárosban.
  EN FS: Marathon in the forest.
  hu FS: Maraton az erdőben.
  EN TP: running a city marathon
  hu TP: városi maraton futása
  EN FP: a movie marathon
  hu FP: filmmaraton
5125 | stage (verb): to perform a play on a stage | loc: színre vinni
  EN TS: They are staging a revolution!
  hu TS: Forradalmat visznek színre!
  EN FS: They are staging a wedding!
  hu FS: Esküvőt visznek színre!
  EN TP: staging an old play
  hu TP: régi darab színre vitele
  EN FP: staging a protest
  hu FP: tüntetés megszervezése
5126 | business (noun): a company and the people who work in it | loc: vállalkozás
  EN TS: He is proud of his business.
  hu TS: Büszke a vállalkozására.
  EN FS: He is proud of his car.
  hu FS: Büszke az autójára.
  EN TP: a small corner business
  hu TP: kis sarki vállalkozás
  EN FP: a big online business
  hu FP: nagy online vállalkozás
5127 | shut (verb): to move a lid so an opening is closed | loc: becsukni
  EN TS: The suitcase won't shut!
  hu TS: A bőröndöt nem lehet becsukni!
  EN FS: The suitcase won't open!
  hu FS: A bőröndöt nem lehet kinyitni!
  EN TP: to shut a full suitcase
  hu TP: tele bőrönd becsukása
  EN FP: to shut a window
  hu FP: ablak becsukása
5128 | hurt (noun): damage to the body from an accident | loc: sérülés
  EN TS: The sofa caused real hurt!
  hu TS: A kanapé komoly sérülést okozott!
  EN FS: The table caused real hurt!
  hu FS: Az asztal komoly sérülést okozott!
  EN TP: hurt from the sofa corner
  hu TP: sérülés a kanapé sarkától
  EN FP: hurt from a football game
  hu FP: sérülés egy focimeccsen
5129 | cover (noun): a sheet put over a thing to shelter it | loc: takaró
  EN TS: The furniture is under covers.
  hu TS: A bútorok takarók alatt vannak.
  EN FS: The furniture is under towels.
  hu FS: A bútorok törölközők alatt vannak.
  EN TP: grey covers on furniture
  hu TP: szürke takarók a bútorokon
  EN FP: a cover on a book
  hu FP: borító egy könyvön
5130 | kite (noun): a cloth wing on strings pulled by the wind | loc: sárkány
  EN TS: His kite is flying so high!
  hu TS: Nagyon magasan száll a sárkánya!
  EN FS: His drone is flying so high!
  hu FS: Nagyon magasan száll a drónja!
  EN TP: flying a kite
  hu TP: sárkányeregetés
  EN FP: a kite in a tree
  hu FP: sárkány egy fán
5131 | focus (verb): to direct your attention on something | loc: összpontosítani
  EN TS: He is focusing on the ball.
  hu TS: A labdára összpontosít.
  EN FS: He is focusing on the boys.
  hu FS: A fiúkra összpontosít.
  EN TP: focusing on the ball
  hu TP: összpontosítás a labdára
  EN FP: focusing on the crowd
  hu FP: összpontosítás a tömegre
5132 | mixture (noun): a substance of two or more things mixed together | loc: keverék
  EN TS: He is pouring the mixture.
  hu TS: Önti a keveréket.
  EN FS: He is stirring the mixture.
  hu FS: Kavarja a keveréket.
  EN TP: pancake mixture in a pan
  hu TP: palacsintakeverék a serpenyőben
  EN FP: a mixture of paint colours
  hu FP: festékszínek keveréke
5133 | scream (verb): to cry out very loudly in fear | loc: sikít
  EN TS: She is screaming in the park.
  hu TS: A parkban sikít.
  EN FS: She is screaming in the pool.
  hu FS: A medencében sikít.
  EN TP: screaming in a freeze game
  hu TP: sikítás egy szoborjátékban
  EN FP: screaming at a horror film
  hu FP: sikítás egy horrorfilmnél
5134 | parent (noun): a father or mother of a child | loc: szülő
  EN TS: The parents are a bit busy.
  hu TS: A szülők kicsit elfoglaltak.
  EN FS: The dogs are a bit busy.
  hu FS: A kutyák kicsit elfoglaltak.
  EN TP: parents feeding a baby
  hu TP: babát etető szülők
  EN FP: parents feeding the ducks
  hu FP: kacsákat etető szülők
5135 | space (noun): an area kept for one particular purpose | loc: hely
  EN TS: Tight space, perfect parking.
  hu TS: Szűk hely, tökéletes parkolás.
  EN FS: Wide space, perfect parking.
  hu FS: Tág hely, tökéletes parkolás.
  EN TP: a tight parking space
  hu TP: szűk parkolóhely
  EN FP: a space rocket launch
  hu FP: űrrakéta kilövése
5136 | debate (noun): a discussion with reasons for and against | loc: vita
  EN TS: The debate is getting loud!
  hu TS: Egyre hangosabb a vita!
  EN FS: The debate is getting quiet!
  hu FS: Egyre csendesebb a vita!
  EN TP: a loud debate
  hu TP: hangos vita
  EN FP: a debate on TV
  hu FP: tévévita
5137 | parliament (noun): the building where politicians make laws | loc: parlament
  EN TS: The parliament is full today.
  hu TS: Ma tele van a parlament.
  EN FS: The parliament is empty today.
  hu FS: Ma üres a parlament.
  EN TP: a full parliament
  hu TP: teli parlament
  EN FP: an empty parliament
  hu FP: üres parlament
5138 | train (noun): railway cars joined together that carry people | loc: vonat
  EN TS: She is on the train now.
  hu TS: Most a vonaton ül.
  EN FS: She is on the bus now.
  hu FS: Most a buszon ül.
  EN TP: a seat on the train
  hu TP: ülőhely a vonaton
  EN FP: a seat on the plane
  hu FP: ülőhely a repülőn
5139 | blank (adjective): with nothing written or printed on it | loc: üres
  EN TS: The pages were blank at first.
  hu TS: Az oldalak eleinte üresek voltak.
  EN FS: The pages were full at first.
  hu FS: Az oldalak eleinte tele voltak.
  EN TP: a blank passport page
  hu TP: üres útlevéloldal
  EN FP: a blank face
  hu FP: üres arckifejezés
5140 | allow (verb): to give someone permission to do something | loc: engedni
  EN TS: The stamp allows her to enter.
  hu TS: A pecsét megengedi, hogy belépjen.
  EN FS: The stamp allows her to drive.
  hu FS: A pecsét megengedi, hogy vezessen.
  EN TP: allowed to enter
  hu TP: belépni engedik
  EN FP: allowed to smoke
  hu FP: dohányozni engedik
5141 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: orvos
  EN TS: The doctor has a stethoscope.
  hu TS: Az orvosnál sztetoszkóp van.
  EN FS: The doctor has a camera.
  hu FS: Az orvosnál fényképezőgép van.
  EN TP: a doctor with a stethoscope
  hu TP: orvos sztetoszkóppal
  EN FP: a doctor in an ambulance
  hu FP: orvos a mentőautóban
5142 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: környék
  EN TS: The neighborhood is decorated.
  hu TS: A környék fel van díszítve.
  EN FS: The neighborhood is empty.
  hu FS: A környék üres.
  EN TP: a decorated neighborhood
  hu TP: feldíszített környék
  EN FP: a neighborhood yard sale
  hu FP: környékbeli garázsvásár
5143 | peace (noun): the state of having no war | loc: béke
  EN TS: The soldiers are making peace.
  hu TS: A katonák békét kötnek.
  EN FS: The soldiers are making war.
  hu FS: A katonák háborút viselnek.
  EN TP: making peace
  hu TP: békekötés
  EN FP: peace and quiet at home
  hu FP: béke és nyugalom otthon
5144 | dove (noun): the white bird used as a sign of peace | loc: galamb
  EN TS: The girls are releasing doves!
  hu TS: A lányok galambokat engednek szabadon!
  EN FS: The boys are releasing doves!
  hu FS: A fiúk galambokat engednek szabadon!
  EN TP: releasing white doves
  hu TP: fehér galambok elengedése
  EN FP: feeding white doves
  hu FP: fehér galambok etetése
5145 | tram (noun): an electric city train on rails in the street | loc: villamos
  EN TS: The tram is right behind him.
  hu TS: A villamos közvetlenül mögötte van.
  EN FS: The bus is right behind him.
  hu FS: A busz közvetlenül mögötte van.
  EN TP: a tram on the square
  hu TP: villamos a téren
  EN FP: a tram on a bridge
  hu FP: villamos a hídon
5146 | strip (noun): a long narrow piece of something | loc: csík
  EN TS: The peel is one long strip!
  hu TS: A héj egyetlen hosszú csík!
  EN FS: The peel is two short strips!
  hu FS: A héj két rövid csík!
  EN TP: a long strip of peel
  hu TP: hosszú héjcsík
  EN FP: a strip of tape
  hu FP: ragasztószalag-csík
5147 | people (noun): any group of human beings together | loc: emberek
  EN TS: So many people are crossing!
  hu TS: Annyi ember kel át!
  EN FS: So many cars are crossing!
  hu FS: Annyi autó kel át!
  EN TP: people filling the crossing
  hu TP: zebrát elárasztó emberek
  EN FP: people waiting for a bus
  hu FP: buszra váró emberek
5148 | morning (noun): the time between dawn and noon | loc: reggel
  EN TS: Good morning, empty city!
  hu TS: Jó reggelt, üres város!
  EN FS: Good night, empty city!
  hu FS: Jó éjszakát, üres város!
  EN TP: an empty morning street
  hu TP: üres reggeli utca
  EN FP: a busy morning street
  hu FP: nyüzsgő reggeli utca
5149 | pharmacy (noun): a shop where you buy medicine | loc: gyógyszertár
  EN TS: What a big old pharmacy!
  hu TS: Micsoda nagy, régi gyógyszertár!
  EN FS: What a big old bakery!
  hu FS: Micsoda nagy, régi pékség!
  EN TP: a grand old pharmacy
  hu TP: impozáns régi gyógyszertár
  EN FP: a pharmacy in a hospital
  hu FP: kórházi gyógyszertár
5150 | prescription (noun): directions a doctor writes down beforehand | loc: recept
  EN TS: He is presenting a prescription.
  hu TS: Receptet mutat fel.
  EN FS: He is presenting a train ticket.
  hu FS: Vonatjegyet mutat fel.
  EN TP: handing over a prescription
  hu TP: recept átadása
  EN FP: writing a prescription
  hu FP: recept felírása
5151 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: keret
  EN TS: The frame is silver.
  hu TS: A keret ezüst.
  EN FS: The frame is gold.
  hu FS: A keret arany.
  EN TP: a silver picture frame
  hu TP: ezüst képkeret
  EN FP: a silver window frame
  hu FP: ezüst ablakkeret
5152 | bedroom (noun): the room you sleep in | loc: hálószoba
  EN TS: Her bedroom is all pillows!
  hu TS: A hálószobája csupa párna!
  EN FS: Her bedroom is all books!
  hu FS: A hálószobája csupa könyv!
  EN TP: pillows in the bedroom
  hu TP: párnák a hálószobában
  EN FP: pillows in the living room
  hu FP: párnák a nappaliban
5153 | bed (noun): a plot of ground where plants are growing | loc: ágyás
  EN TS: The team is planting the bed.
  hu TS: A csapat beülteti az ágyást.
  EN FS: The team is painting the bed.
  hu FS: A csapat kifesti az ágyást.
  EN TP: a raised garden bed
  hu TP: magaságyás
  EN FP: an unmade bed
  hu FP: bevetetlen ágy
5154 | houseplant (noun): a plant kept indoors in a pot for decoration | loc: szobanövény
  EN TS: His houseplants are a jungle.
  hu TS: A szobanövényei valóságos dzsungel.
  EN FS: His books are a jungle.
  hu FS: A könyvei valóságos dzsungel.
  EN TP: a room full of houseplants
  hu TP: szobanövényekkel teli szoba
  EN FP: a houseplant for sale
  hu FP: eladó szobanövény
5155 | lunch (noun): a meal eaten in the middle of the day | loc: ebéd
  EN TS: Lunch for the whole family!
  hu TS: Ebéd az egész családnak!
  EN FS: Lunch for just two people!
  hu FS: Ebéd csak két embernek!
  EN TP: a big family lunch
  hu TP: nagy családi ebéd
  EN FP: a quick lunch at work
  hu FP: gyors ebéd a munkahelyen
5156 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: letérdelni
  EN TS: He scored, so he is kneeling.
  hu TS: Gólt lőtt, ezért letérdel.
  EN FS: He missed, so he is kneeling.
  hu FS: Hibázott, ezért letérdel.
  EN TP: kneeling on the grass
  hu TP: letérdel a fűre
  EN FP: kneeling to pray
  hu FP: imához letérdel
5157 | neighbourhood (noun): the nearby area around where you live | loc: szomszédság
  EN TS: The whole neighbourhood is playing football!
  hu TS: Az egész szomszédság focizik!
  EN FS: The whole neighbourhood is playing volleyball!
  hu FS: Az egész szomszédság röplabdázik!
  EN TP: a neighbourhood football game
  hu TP: szomszédsági focimeccs
  EN FP: a neighbourhood bike race
  hu FP: szomszédsági biciklis verseny
5158 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: összekapcsolni
  EN TS: He is connecting the cables.
  hu TS: Összekapcsolja a kábeleket.
  EN FS: He is cutting the cables.
  hu FS: Elvágja a kábeleket.
  EN TP: connecting a gaming setup
  hu TP: gamer setup összekapcsolása
  EN FP: connecting with friends
  hu FP: kapcsolattartás a barátokkal
5159 | wet (verb): to make something wet | loc: benedvesít
  EN TS: The pipe wet him on purpose.
  hu TS: A cső direkt benedvesítette.
  EN FS: The dog wet him on purpose.
  hu FS: A kutya direkt benedvesítette.
  EN TP: wetting the plumber's face
  hu TP: a vízszerelő arcának benedvesítése
  EN FP: wetting the kitchen plants
  hu FP: a konyhai növények benedvesítése
5160 | dash (verb): to run or move very quickly | loc: rohanni
  EN TS: He's dashing through the rain.
  hu TS: Rohan az esőben.
  EN FS: He's dashing through the snow.
  hu FS: Rohan a hóban.
  EN TP: dashing past pigeons
  hu TP: rohanás a galambok mellett
  EN FP: dashing past the police
  hu FP: rohanás a rendőrök mellett
5161 | cathedral (noun): a very large and important church | loc: székesegyház
  EN TS: He stands before a cathedral.
  hu TS: Egy székesegyház előtt áll.
  EN FS: He stands before a castle.
  hu FS: Egy kastély előtt áll.
  EN TP: a brick cathedral tower
  hu TP: téglából épült székesegyháztorony
  EN FP: inside a dark cathedral
  hu FP: egy sötét székesegyház belseje
5162 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: gyönyörű
  EN TS: Beautiful views and dumplings.
  hu TS: Gyönyörű kilátás és gombócok.
  EN FS: Beautiful views and pancakes.
  hu FS: Gyönyörű kilátás és palacsinta.
  EN TP: a beautiful mountain lake
  hu TP: gyönyörű hegyi tó
  EN FP: a beautiful beach
  hu FP: gyönyörű tengerpart
5163 | politician (noun): a leader who works in government | loc: politikus
  EN TS: Politicians, arguing as usual.
  hu TS: Politikusok, szokás szerint vitatkoznak.
  EN FS: Politicians, hugging as usual.
  hu FS: Politikusok, szokás szerint ölelkeznek.
  EN TP: angry politicians pointing
  hu TP: mutogató dühös politikusok
  EN FP: politicians shaking hands
  hu FP: kezet rázó politikusok
5164 | campaign (noun): a race between candidates for office | loc: kampány
  EN TS: This campaign has it all: posters, debates, confetti.
  hu TS: Ebben a kampányban minden van: plakátok, viták, konfetti.
  EN FS: This campaign has it all: posters, debates, fireworks.
  hu FS: Ebben a kampányban minden van: plakátok, viták, tűzijáték.
  EN TP: an election campaign
  hu TP: választási kampány
  EN FP: a campaign against smoking
  hu FP: dohányzásellenes kampány
5165 | plastic (noun): a material that can be molded into objects | loc: műanyag
  EN TS: The river is full of plastic.
  hu TS: A folyó tele van műanyaggal.
  EN FS: The river is full of fish.
  hu FS: A folyó tele van hallal.
  EN TP: plastic in the river
  hu TP: műanyag a folyóban
  EN FP: plastic in a recycling bin
  hu FP: műanyag a szelektív kukában
5166 | track (noun): the pair of rails that wheels run along | loc: sín
  EN TS: The tram is on the tracks.
  hu TS: A villamos a síneken van.
  EN FS: The tram is on the grass.
  hu FS: A villamos a füvön van.
  EN TP: tram tracks in the cobbles
  hu TP: villamossín a macskakőben
  EN FP: tram tracks in a tunnel
  hu FP: villamossín egy alagútban
5167 | tile (noun): a flat square piece covering a floor | loc: csempe
  EN TS: He is touching the blue tiles.
  hu TS: Megérinti a kék csempéket.
  EN FS: He is touching the red tiles.
  hu FS: Megérinti a piros csempéket.
  EN TP: blue-and-white wall tiles
  hu TP: kék-fehér falicsempék
  EN FP: tiles on a bathroom floor
  hu FP: csempék egy fürdőszobapadlón
5168 | batch (noun): all the cakes baked at the same time | loc: adag
  EN TS: The batch of tarts is okay.
  hu TS: Ez az adag pudingos pite rendben van.
  EN FS: The batch of bread is okay.
  hu FS: Ez az adag kenyér rendben van.
  EN TP: a batch of custard tarts
  hu TP: egy adag pudingos pite
  EN FP: a batch of cookies
  hu FP: egy adag keksz
5169 | mail (verb): to send something by the postal service | loc: postázni
  EN TS: He is mailing a postcard.
  hu TS: Egy képeslapot postáz.
  EN FS: He is mailing a package.
  hu FS: Egy csomagot postáz.
  EN TP: mailing a postcard
  hu TP: képeslap postázása
  EN FP: mailing a parcel
  hu FP: csomag postázása
5170 | package (noun): a wrapped container you send or give | loc: csomag
  EN TS: He is handing over a package.
  hu TS: Átad egy csomagot.
  EN FS: He is handing over a pizza.
  hu FS: Átad egy pizzát.
  EN TP: a wrapped birthday package
  hu TP: becsomagolt születésnapi csomag
  EN FP: a package holiday
  hu FP: utazási csomag
5171 | add (verb): to join one thing to a group of others | loc: hozzáadni
  EN TS: He is adding stock to the pot.
  hu TS: Alaplevet ad hozzá a fazékban lévő ételhez.
  EN FS: He is adding milk to the pot.
  hu FS: Tejet ad hozzá a fazékban lévő ételhez.
  EN TP: adding vegetables to the pot
  hu TP: zöldség hozzáadása a fazékhoz
  EN FP: adding salt to the soup
  hu FP: só hozzáadása a leveshez
5172 | bang (verb): to hit something hard and violently | loc: csapkodni
  EN TS: Poor dough! He is banging it.
  hu TS: Szegény tészta! Csapkodja.
  EN FS: Poor door! He is banging it.
  hu FS: Szegény ajtó! Csapkodja.
  EN TP: banging on bread dough
  hu TP: kenyértészta csapkodása
  EN FP: banging on the front door
  hu FP: a bejárati ajtó csapkodása
5173 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: esőkabát
  EN TS: Good thing she has a raincoat.
  hu TS: Még jó, hogy van esőkabátja.
  EN FS: Good thing she has a sun hat.
  hu FS: Még jó, hogy van napkalapja.
  EN TP: a red hooded raincoat
  hu TP: piros kapucnis esőkabát
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  hu FP: esőkabát egy fogason
5174 | cheerful (adjective): bright and happy in a way that lifts you | loc: vidám
  EN TS: It is a cheerful dinner.
  hu TS: Ez egy vidám vacsora.
  EN FS: It is a cheerful breakfast.
  hu FS: Ez egy vidám reggeli.
  EN TP: a cheerful family dinner
  hu TP: vidám családi vacsora
  EN FP: a cheerful office party
  hu FP: vidám irodai buli
5175 | moustache (noun): the hair a man grows on his upper lip | loc: bajusz
  EN TS: Nice moustache, steady hands.
  hu TS: Szép bajusz, biztos kéz.
  EN FS: Nice beard, steady hands.
  hu FS: Szép szakáll, biztos kéz.
  EN TP: a waiter with a moustache
  hu TP: bajuszos pincér
  EN FP: a waiter shaving his moustache
  hu FP: bajszát borotváló pincér
5176 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: bögre
  EN TS: Hot coffee in a big mug.
  hu TS: Forró kávé egy nagy bögrében.
  EN FS: Hot tea in a big mug.
  hu FS: Forró tea egy nagy bögrében.
  EN TP: a big white mug
  hu TP: nagy fehér bögre
  EN FP: a mug with no handle
  hu FP: fül nélküli bögre
5177 | teapot (noun): a container with a spout for pouring tea | loc: teáskanna
  EN TS: She is pouring from a teapot.
  hu TS: Egy teáskannából tölt.
  EN FS: She is pouring from a bottle.
  hu FS: Egy üvegből tölt.
  EN TP: pouring from a white teapot
  hu TP: töltés egy fehér teáskannából
  EN FP: a teapot on the stove
  hu FP: teáskanna a tűzhelyen
5178 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: fejkendő
  EN TS: She is baking in a headscarf.
  hu TS: Fejkendőben süt.
  EN FS: She is baking in a hat.
  hu FS: Kalapban süt.
  EN TP: a navy headscarf
  hu TP: sötétkék fejkendő
  EN FP: a headscarf in the wind
  hu FP: fejkendő a szélben
5179 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: elérni
  EN TS: She is reaching into the oven.
  hu TS: Benyúl a sütőbe, hogy elérjen valamit.
  EN FS: She is reaching into a fridge.
  hu FS: Benyúl a hűtőbe, hogy elérjen valamit.
  EN TP: reaching toward a hot oven
  hu TP: a forró sütő felé nyúl
  EN FP: reaching the top shelf
  hu FP: eléri a legfelső polcot
5180 | speaker (noun): someone who speaks to a group of people | loc: szónok
  EN TS: The speaker is at the lectern.
  hu TS: A szónok a pulpitusnál áll.
  EN FS: The speaker is at the piano.
  hu FS: A szónok a zongoránál áll.
  EN TP: a speaker at a lectern
  hu TP: szónok a pulpitusnál
  EN FP: a speaker in the audience
  hu FP: szónok a közönség soraiban
5181 | signature (noun): your name written in your own handwriting | loc: aláírás
  EN TS: Her signature is in blue ink.
  hu TS: Az aláírása kék tintával van.
  EN FS: Her signature is in red ink.
  hu FS: Az aláírása piros tintával van.
  EN TP: a fresh blue signature
  hu TP: friss kék aláírás
  EN FP: a signature on a cheque
  hu FP: aláírás egy csekken
5182 | achievement (noun): the action of finishing something difficult | loc: teljesítmény
  EN TS: Look, the mural is her achievement.
  hu TS: Nézd, a falfestmény a lány teljesítménye!
  EN FS: Look, the mural is his achievement.
  hu FS: Nézd, a falfestmény a srác teljesítménye!
  EN TP: a big mural achievement
  hu TP: falfestmény, mint nagy teljesítmény
  EN FP: a video game achievement
  hu FP: videojátékos teljesítmény
5183 | passionate (adjective): showing very strong emotions | loc: szenvedélyes
  EN TS: So passionate, the chalk is flying!
  hu TS: Olyan szenvedélyes, hogy repül a kréta!
  EN FS: So passionate, the books are flying!
  hu FS: Olyan szenvedélyes, hogy repülnek a könyvek!
  EN TP: a passionate old teacher
  hu TP: szenvedélyes idős tanár
  EN FP: a passionate young singer
  hu FP: szenvedélyes fiatal énekes
5184 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: romantikus
  EN TS: He proposed. So romantic!
  hu TS: Megkérte a kezét. Milyen romantikus!
  EN FS: He sang. So romantic!
  hu FS: Énekelt neki. Milyen romantikus!
  EN TP: a romantic proposal
  hu TP: romantikus lánykérés
  EN FP: a romantic comedy film
  hu FP: romantikus vígjáték
5185 | kindness (noun): being considerate and sympathetic to others | loc: kedvesség
  EN TS: Kindness keeps the man dry.
  hu TS: A kedvesség szárazon tartja a férfit.
  EN FS: Kindness keeps the dog dry.
  hu FS: A kedvesség szárazon tartja a kutyát.
  EN TP: kindness in the rain
  hu TP: kedvesség az esőben
  EN FP: kindness in the sun
  hu FP: kedvesség a napsütésben
5186 | public (noun): people in general, taken as a whole | loc: nagyközönség
  EN TS: The public is in the square.
  hu TS: A nagyközönség a téren van.
  EN FS: The public is in the church.
  hu FS: A nagyközönség a templomban van.
  EN TP: the public in the square
  hu TP: nagyközönség a téren
  EN FP: the public in the theatre
  hu FP: nagyközönség a színházban
5187 | wagon (noun): a wheeled vehicle pulled by a tractor or animal | loc: szekér
  EN TS: Strong boy! He's pulling a wagon!
  hu TS: Erős fiú! Szekeret húz!
  EN FS: Strong boy! He's pulling a car!
  hu FS: Erős fiú! Autót húz!
  EN TP: pulling a farm wagon
  hu TP: farmszekér húzása
  EN FP: pulling a horse wagon
  hu FP: lovaskocsi húzása
5188 | disappointment (noun): the feeling when your expectations are not met | loc: csalódás
  EN TS: A boot? Total disappointment.
  hu TS: Egy csizma? Totális csalódás.
  EN FS: A fish? Total disappointment.
  hu FS: Egy hal? Totális csalódás.
  EN TP: disappointment on a jetty
  hu TP: csalódás a stégen
  EN FP: disappointment at a zoo
  hu FP: csalódás az állatkertben
5189 | weather (noun): the state of the sky: sun, rain, wind, clouds | loc: időjárás
  EN TS: Weather check: still raining.
  hu TS: Időjárás-ellenőrzés: még mindig esik.
  EN FS: Weather check: still snowing.
  hu FS: Időjárás-ellenőrzés: még mindig havazik.
  EN TP: checking the weather by hand
  hu TP: időjárás ellenőrzése kézzel
  EN FP: the weather on TV
  hu FP: időjárás a tévében
5190 | windy (adjective): with a lot of wind blowing | loc: szeles
  EN TS: Windy? She loves it!
  hu TS: Szeles? Imádja!
  EN FS: Sunny? She loves it!
  hu FS: Napos? Imádja!
  EN TP: a windy seafront
  hu TP: szeles tengerpart
  EN FP: a windy mountain top
  hu FP: szeles hegycsúcs
5191 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: havas
  EN TS: A flag on a snowy plain.
  hu TS: Zászló egy havas síkságon.
  EN FS: A flag on a sandy beach.
  hu FS: Zászló egy homokos strandon.
  EN TP: a snowy white plain
  hu TP: havas fehér síkság
  EN FP: a snowy city street
  hu FP: havas városi utca
5192 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: horizont
  EN TS: Only snow up to the horizon.
  hu TS: Csak hó a horizontig.
  EN FS: Only sand up to the horizon.
  hu FS: Csak homok a horizontig.
  EN TP: snow up to the horizon
  hu TP: hó a horizontig
  EN FP: the sea on the horizon
  hu FP: tenger a horizonton
5193 | rash (noun): red itchy spots on the skin | loc: kiütés
  EN TS: Cream on the rash? It stings!
  hu TS: Krém a kiütésre? Csíp!
  EN FS: Cream on the burn? It stings!
  hu FS: Krém az égésre? Csíp!
  EN TP: cream on a red rash
  hu TP: krém egy piros kiütésen
  EN FP: a rash on her cheek
  hu FP: kiütés az arcán
5194 | novel (noun): a long fictional story printed as a book | loc: regény
  EN TS: Guess who loves this novel?
  hu TS: Találd ki, ki imádja ezt a regényt?
  EN FS: Guess who loves this film?
  hu FS: Találd ki, ki imádja ezt a filmet?
  EN TP: reading a thick novel
  hu TP: vastag regényt olvas
  EN FP: writing a novel
  hu FP: regényt ír
5195 | bench (noun): a long seat for more than one person | loc: pad
  EN TS: His books take up the whole bench.
  hu TS: A könyvei az egész padot elfoglalják.
  EN FS: His shoes take up the whole bench.
  hu FS: A cipői az egész padot elfoglalják.
  EN TP: books on a park bench
  hu TP: könyvek egy parki padon
  EN FP: a dog on a bench
  hu FP: kutya egy padon
5196 | bun (noun): hair twisted into a round knot on the head | loc: konty
  EN TS: Her bun and her book go everywhere.
  hu TS: A kontya és a könyve mindenhová vele megy.
  EN FS: Her bun and her dog go everywhere.
  hu FS: A kontya és a kutyája mindenhová vele megy.
  EN TP: a blonde bun on top
  hu TP: szőke konty a feje tetején
  EN FP: a sweet bun
  hu FP: egy cukros kalács
5197 | rebel (verb): to take part in a rebellion | loc: fellázad
  EN TS: The office is rebelling!
  hu TS: Az iroda fellázad!
  EN FS: The office is sleeping!
  hu FS: Az iroda alszik!
  EN TP: rebelling against work
  hu TP: fellázad a munka ellen
  EN FP: rebelling against parents
  hu FP: fellázad a szülei ellen
5198 | sheet (noun): paper you write or print on | loc: lap
  EN TS: She is handing him a sheet.
  hu TS: Átad neki egy lapot.
  EN FS: She is handing him a cup.
  hu FS: Átad neki egy csészét.
  EN TP: a small written sheet
  hu TP: kis kézzel írt lap
  EN FP: a sheet on a bed
  hu FP: lepedő az ágyon
5199 | follow (verb): to act in the way rules tell you | loc: követni
  EN TS: Recipe followed step by step.
  hu TS: A receptet lépésről lépésre követte.
  EN FS: Map followed step by step.
  hu FS: A térképet lépésről lépésre követte.
  EN TP: following a handwritten recipe
  hu TP: kézzel írt recept követése
  EN FP: following a friend online
  hu FP: egy barát követése online
5200 | lively (adjective): full of life and energy | loc: élénk
  EN TS: What a lively group!
  hu TS: Micsoda élénk társaság!
  EN FS: What a lively dog!
  hu FS: Micsoda élénk kutya!
  EN TP: a lively living room
  hu TP: élénk nappali
  EN FP: a lively dance club
  hu FP: élénk táncklub
5201 | reflect (verb): to send an image or light back | loc: tükrözni
  EN TS: The water reflects everything, including the volcano.
  hu TS: A víz mindent tükröz, még a vulkánt is.
  EN FS: The water reflects everything, including the moon.
  hu FS: A víz mindent tükröz, még a holdat is.
  EN TP: a volcano reflected in water
  hu TP: vízben tükröződő vulkán
  EN FP: a face in a mirror
  hu FP: arc a tükörben
5202 | put (verb): to set something down in a certain place | loc: tenni | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She put the whole shop in the fridge!
  hu TS: Az egész boltot a hűtőbe tette!
  EN FS: She put the whole shop in the oven!
  hu FS: Az egész boltot a sütőbe tette!
  EN TP: putting food in the fridge
  hu TP: ételt tesz a hűtőbe
  EN FP: putting food on the table
  hu FP: ételt tesz az asztalra
5203 | relative (noun): a person related by blood or marriage | loc: rokon
  EN TS: The relatives have arrived!
  hu TS: Megérkeztek a rokonok!
  EN FS: The relatives have left!
  hu FS: Elmentek a rokonok!
  EN TP: relatives at the front door
  hu TP: rokonok a bejárati ajtónál
  EN FP: relatives at an airport
  hu FP: rokonok a reptéren
5204 | improve (verb): to make better | loc: feljavítani
  EN TS: The room has improved a lot.
  hu TS: A szobát nagyon feljavították.
  EN FS: The garden has improved a lot.
  hu FS: A kertet nagyon feljavították.
  EN TP: improving an old room
  hu TP: régi szoba feljavítása
  EN FP: improving their English
  hu FP: angoltudás feljavítása
5205 | oath (noun): a serious promise to tell the truth | loc: eskü
  EN TS: She is taking the oath.
  hu TS: A nő leteszi az esküt.
  EN FS: He is taking the oath.
  hu FS: A férfi leteszi az esküt.
  EN TP: taking an oath
  hu TP: esküt tesz
  EN FP: breaking an oath
  hu FP: megszegi az esküt
5206 | evidence (noun): your reason for belief or disbelief | loc: bizonyíték
  EN TS: She found the evidence!
  hu TS: Megtalálta a bizonyítékot!
  EN FS: She lost the evidence!
  hu FS: Elvesztette a bizonyítékot!
  EN TP: pinning up evidence
  hu TP: bizonyítékok kitűzése
  EN FP: hiding the evidence
  hu FP: a bizonyíték elrejtése
5207 | sweat (noun): the salty fluid your skin lets out when hot | loc: izzadság
  EN TS: Big mountains, lots of sweat.
  hu TS: Nagy hegyek, sok izzadság.
  EN FS: Big lakes, lots of sweat.
  hu FS: Nagy tavak, sok izzadság.
  EN TP: dripping with sweat
  hu TP: csurog az izzadság
  EN FP: sweat after a sauna
  hu FP: izzadság szauna után
5208 | cuisine (noun): a style of preparing food, or that food | loc: konyha
  EN TS: Every cuisine amazes him!
  hu TS: Minden konyha lenyűgözi!
  EN FS: Every drink amazes him!
  hu FS: Minden ital lenyűgözi!
  EN TP: three different cuisines
  hu TP: három különböző konyha
  EN FP: just one cuisine
  hu FP: csak egyetlen konyha
5209 | lounge (verb): to sit or lie back comfortably doing nothing | loc: heverészni
  EN TS: Nobody works; they are all lounging.
  hu TS: Senki nem dolgozik, mindenki heverészik.
  EN FS: Nobody works; they are all dancing.
  hu FS: Senki nem dolgozik, mindenki táncol.
  EN TP: lounging in a hammock
  hu TP: heverészés egy függőágyban
  EN FP: lounging on a boat
  hu FP: heverészés egy hajón
